Americans are already following the British investigation to learn about the decision to invade Iraq — information that remains classified or unavailable in the United States (here).
Digital Zoom: x 5.7
Canada's Immigration and Refugee Board granted Huntley's application last August after finding him a credible witness.
Attendance: You are allowed six excused absences for the length of the course, including all lectures and screenings. This includes sick days, family emergencies and other documented absences. After that, 5% of the final grade will be deducted for each absence. 10 absences, or more, will result in an automatic failure for the course.
So. This blog post written, the washing in the machine and on the line, I will step back slowly from the computer and take the day off. I have flung open the doors and windows, despite it being only 12 degrees outside and I am going to sit in the sun and read some other mad writers’ ramblings/words of wisdom/lyrical prose/insane witterings/seering insights. I’ll decide just what after I’ve spent several minutes staring at the pile of books that have been breeding next to my bed. Tomorrow, I will no doubt enter from stage left, again, clad in my jammies and descend upon the cave. But that’s tomorrow and today the batty recluse needs to grasp at the straw of sanity drifting in the wintery breeze.
For our anniversary, my husband surprised me with a new white iPad 2. That, I can finally call my 'own', at least for a little while. I needed a case for it, beyond the smart cover that Apple sells, so I took a peek at Etsy. I found a sweet case with vintage flair, at Julie Meyer.
As you know I am putting out a product range which is being introduced to the world via a series of children's novels. Soon a new character will hit the globe and children everywhere will know her name. Well, that's my intention.
I first encountered modular storytelling as it was referenced in passing by comic writer Grant Morrison. I did some digging. Modular storytelling developed from analysis of narrative as it applies to video games. Since I love the Final Fantasy series, I’ll start there. The Final Fantasy series is renowned for great plots and compelling characters. However, being video games, these stories have an aspect of interactivity to them. There is a linear plot, but some installments in the series (VI, VII) have optional characters. These characters don’t advance the main plot, but they may add background information; they may add insight. To me, this is the real threat to books: interactive stories.
"Perfect information" is the most ridiculous assumption on the list - the biggest reason for "bubbles" in the market is that nobody knows the real quality or value of investments like "derivatives," real estate, or many other products. In oligarchical settings (where there are few producers), "profit maximization" may go out the window in deference to other goals like driving competitors out of the market and maximizing market share. And deviations among products (the relative perceived quality of Honda vs. Toyota vs. Ford vs. Chrysler, for example), make the model inapplicable to many products compared to, say, agricultural commodities where, at the end of the day, wheat is wheat. (See a longer list of criticisms here.)
First off I would like to apologize for slacking the last 4 days. I have been in a serious slump. Nothing right now is making me happy. I was looking at suits for the men yesterday and hair pieces for me and was just blah about it all. And the honeymoon has become the biggest downer. I always thought when we planned for the honeymoon it would be fun and we would find a place we loved and that would be it. No, that is not it at all. It’s stress and frustration and tears. I don’t know if it’s the full moon that is tomorrow or that the wedding is fast approaching but I feel just frozen. Patrick and I are fighting over the hotel for the honeymoon and it’s just not turning into the picture I have in my head. I just always pictured going to Hawaii and staying in this beautiful resort with sparkling pools with waterfalls and tropical gardens that of course is right on the beach and close to local attraction but also makes you feel secluded if you want to. Like maybe say The Sheraton Resort & Spa.
This time around I stayed away from weird foods. Well... Almost... One night, after hard night of parting with friends we hit the street food place, and I accidentally ate something that was most likely ( sure it was) Pigs brain. I spit it out as fast as I could. Texture was just nasty, and taste was yuck. Yuck, Yuck.
If we are headed toward a great conflagration of currency devaluation and hyperinflation, is it not right that the poor finally be allowed to join the bacchanal before its end?
The program launches
by Jack Prelutsky
To connect with the Animation Gallery, the new Games Lounge highlights how different types of animation are used within videogames. An emulated PC version of Prince of Persia from 1989 showcases the technique of rotoscoping – a method that involves the animator drawing over the top of video footage frame-by-frame to create fluid movement. You can watch the original video footage filmed by the game’s designer Jordan Mechner on YouTube:
In this instance, what struck me as interesting was the way they portrayed the civilian contractors as totally naive casualties of war. These folks went over there with a passionate desire to help, yes, and they felt fucked over when it turned out they were just part of a profiteering system.
I am the rose of Sharon, and the lily of the valleys. Song 2:1
So Williams explained: “Look, Bill, I’m not a bigot . . . But when I get on the plane, I got to tell you, if I see people who are in Muslim garb and I think, you know, they are identifying themselves first and foremost as Muslims, I get worried. I get nervous.”
The sequel to Once and possibly the saddest book I’ve ever read.
In an effort to raise my spirits and self-esteem my ever-lovely friends suggested I try dating through the personal ads. I was somewhat wary, why couldn't I just get off my face on Bacardi Breezer's in a nightclub and see what I ended up with at the end of the night, like everybody else? But no, my friends thought it would be far healthier for me to meet someone outside our social range, and what better way than perusing the personal ads? It would be fun and exciting they assured me.
5) I love Frank Sinatra.
Him: I saw the shirts...I thought I would be helpful. Was I wrong to want to be helpful?
I love watching the congregation light candles as I'm playing Silent Night. However, every year I forget to tell the ushers not to turn the lights ALL the way off during the candle lighting...and only remember when the I'm in the middle of the first verse of the song and the church goes completely dark. I've played Silent Night so many times, I can almost do it by feel now. Almost. The second half of that first verse was improvised as my eyes adjusted, but nobody seemed to mind.
wanted a touch of pink, so i just did the flowers. Well I think it turned out
I do not have any childrens, yet. And having been married for 3.5 years I get THE QUESTION a lot. It's important that it's in all caps because it *hopefully* paints you a little picture as to how my face looks when I actually say the words THE QUESTION. Or even think about being asked THE QUESTION.
He said I do. She said I do. They kissed. Relief.
I have not had much time for crafting, or for doing new posts lately, but I do just HAVE to share with you again, my friend Diane's blog. (Diane Knott's Musings)
These dresses were so quick and easy to make. Once I started, I couldn't help but make a bunch of them. Here are some others that I've made recently:
So, truth be told, this blog is as much for me as it is for you. Okay, really.... it's probably more for me. I started blogging in October of 2006 as a way to capture a glimpse of our life as a family, and when I started, it was more so that I could look back when I am old and gray and REMEMBER than for anything else. I am blessed that I have some new friends because of blogging.... and am blessed that all of those little red dots on my map on the sidebar represent someone who has decided to join me for a little glimpse at "Our Little Scrapbook", too (I have enjoyed your comments over the past 5 1/2 years!)
If Jerusalem is to be the holy city, the theological and political centre of the Kingdom with the temple and its focal point of worship, why is it that Paul does not write of such a hope in any of his letters? He never refers to Jesus Christ as King or even the Great High Priest. Rather Jesus Christ is the Head of the Church and rather than having a priest, we are already seated with Christ in the heavenlies according to Ephesians 2:6.
The door burst open with a squeal. The metal tip of a pistol appeared, followed by a tall, silver-haired man. Sam yelped. He was the man she'd spoken to earlier at the competition. She ducked into Abby, trying to make herself as small and invisible as possible.
* No water problem
The best part of the Scotland 10k for me was definitely the Scottishness of it. Between the pipes (yes, I think that they are music!), and hearing my two favorite national anthems played back-to-back, I was feeling a lot of pride. I also realized that not only are both anthems inspiring and beautiful, but they also are about the same thing: defeating the English. Something close to a Celt’s heart.
I will not boast in anything
I mean, how can you not *love* him???
Once long ago but in a time very much like ours there was a milonga in Bucharest...
His classic film The Great Dictator (1940) saw him taking on the nazis. Here he pitted his celebrity and humour against Hitlers own celebrity and evil. He played a dual role as a jewish barber who has lost his memory in a plane accident in the First World War, and spends time in hospital before being discharged into an anti-semitic country that he does not understand, and Hynkel (Hitler) the dictator leader of Ptomainia, whose armies are the forces of the Double Cross, and will do anything along the lines to increase his possibilitis for supreme power. It ends with Chaplin in his own words giving us a message full of humanitarianism, with a sense of great hope.
With star quality written all over her, the sight of the angelic Ginger Lynn Allen standing between two nerds craving anal sex was the pinnacle of the film's off-kilter sex appeal. Sent over to satisfy the poop-shoot desires of two college students (Tom Byron and Steve Powers), Ginger plays Cherry, a forthright New Wave Hooker in a chi-chi retro number that was poodle rectum red, drive-in theatre blue, and covered in black polka dots. Even though both her southbound holes end up getting prodded with erect penises simultaneously, Ginger manages to maintain an air of dominance about her. Also, the industrial-sounding music that played during the scene was downright awesome and the assertiveness of Ginger's command for one of the dorks to lick her ankle was greatly appreciated.
Maybe it already is, in some ways.
Hosted by Chuck Hahn
I have two sets of vinyl stencils to give away. Although I did not make the Rosemary crate, I have recently created the stencil. You get all four stencils.
Will I continue to blog? Maybe. Maybe not. I do love being able to search my blog when I'm trying to remember something I planted or what time of year a certain plant bloomed, etc. And connecting with kindred spirits is an important element of blogging; Otherwise, why don't I just keep a plant diary, right? Note to kindred spirits: Find me on Facebook in case I ditch the blog.
It's that time to vote again. Thank you to everyone who joined in - hope you enjoyed Loretta's challenge.
Sinead
With time to breathe, we've had cruise memories percolating up in our minds and conversations, events and moments and observations that didn't previously make the blog. I'm almost out of Internet time here at the KW library, so I'll share just one now, then add more later.
Hi everyone! It's been a great spring break and now I'm back to the blogosphere! Here's my last two weeks' worth of books!
I must have calculated fairly well before paddling out, because I didn’t have to duck dive a single wave on the way out – except for the one right when I jumped into the water; the current started sucking out so fast, I ended up dry-docking it with my fingers in between the board and the reef. Great.
This is another version of the calendar file that I made in MMS. I've used the 'January' from an MMS digi kit and layered the DP background in the program. I've then printed this onto SU Very Vanilla CS. The digi kit has all the month papers in different colours so I've made my pages for each month and used different colour backgrounds. The file prints out as half an A4 page.
Luke: Little boys don't put out fires. It's very dangerous. I could get burned very bad.
How can Amazon get away with this? By giving its boilerplate contract with these publishers a tortured reading.
As far back as I can remember I played with Barbies. My absolute favorite thing to do whenever I got a new Barbie was to remove her from the box and promptly restyle her hair and give her a new outfit. As a result of this I had a bad habit of loosing or misplacing many of my Barbie's outfits and the majority of my Barbies were doomed to end up in a jumbled box with a number of other naked Barbies whose clothing had gone missing.
Take for example, the Protection of Women from Domestic Violence Act (PWDVA), 2005. This law in essence, begins with the definition that its a law meant for women to be aggrieved person and not men.
It seems to me that what this whole discussion is simply here to remind us of the fact that self-publishing is still publishing a book in essence, and now that self-publishing is broadly accepted as it is; it is still reluctantly part of the whole publishing industry. Self-published authors must realize and accept that they shelter under the same umbrella of the book buyer, book reader and industry. They must accept that in any form of aspiration, commerce or even faith, there comes an ordained hierarchy whether it is perceived or imposed.”
Apparently it's not her fault that they were yellow. No, that was the sunlight. She couldn't have predicted this.
This little baby is a coprosma quadrifida or native prickly currant bush. The jewel red fruit are prize bird food and the thorny nature of this shrub creates habitat conditions for nesting birds. If you would like to see a bit more about this plant you can go to the Australian National Botanic Gardens site…
I will use the experience of my life to get America right. And I will be able to convince the American people that someone with my experience is very different than Barack Obama. And that experience is how I’ll beat him.
Do they ever get to just enjoy something natural and simple like running through the streets of Copenhagen early in the morning just for the love of it? Like the blog I read this morning on WordPress… beautiful!
Briana
I asked the folks up in Lakeville the status the town's discharge permit and received this reply:Legally, Barnstable is still operating on the permit issued in 1980. As a courtesy they are operating as if the 1989 permit is in effect. That permit could not be issued until the Town completed their CWMP and received a Secretary’s Certificate closing the MEPA process. That Certificate was issued in 2007 and we are waiting for the Town to complete more hydrogeo work before issuing a new permit.I asked Gary Lopez to comment and on this timeline and he responded:That's not exactly fact...
It's my eyes glued to the iphone that makes me miss the flicker of a soul orgasm flickering across a plain friend's face beautifying it beyond your imagination for a split second.
To explore enthusiasm’s potential
In reaction to the allegations I mentioned that I am not a racist person and I went with a mixed race boy the other week.
* rootfs: Set the filesystem type of the root.
- I liked how Meyer was on the field behind the offense for every play. It’s a great way of evaluating the team and it showed his passion.
On my way had to make a quick stop at Vinnies, to buy a slip cos’ I was having a wardrobe malfunction – of the “skirt sticks to leggings and rides up un-attractively” kind. Crisis averted I purchased my ticket to Redfern and was off on the train.
“The Lord is faithful to all His promises and loving to all He has made. “
buckskin and saltly, speckled
Subject : Once again your immoral earnings prevailed over lives.
Afterwards, we went JoBoy's Brew Pub for lunch. The raves on Yelp commented on their exceptional BBQ. Both the manfriend and I tested those reviews with the sampler sandwiches. It's good - the pork and beef were definitely our faves. The beer was decent according to manfriend. I taste tested a glass of wine instead....
But if they’d asked you, would you have done it?
However, I am in no position to complain. I am almost done. I've said it all year, but really, i can taste summer and I can smell freedom. It's whirling towards me in slow motion, in a way that makes it seem so close to me, but so slow to arrive. But when it does arrive? Oh! I can tell it's going to be nothing short of sweet, and every bit worth the time it took to arrive.
3 cloves of garlic minced
It is critical for new competitors to understand that a physique competition is just that…a competition. If a high placing in a show has a good fall-out for you with regard to modelling or acting opportunities, then you are very fortunate. But no one should develop any firm expectations for winning a show other than a medal or trophy and some nice photos that you can look upon fondly in years to come.
3. Boneless skinless chicken breasts, $1.88/lb. at Sun Harvest (through 11/3/10)
It's taken nearly fourteen years.
I then explained to him how one should ask someone to dance, how to take rejection graciously, to not go down the line of women asking one right after the other, and how to read a follower's body language when walking up to her. He sat there taking it all in, asking questions that were perceptive, until he finally said "What else do I need to know?"
I've been contemplating, examining, and role playing in my head a lot lately with how to deal with, react to what Rudy does sometimes (lately it has been maybe 1-2x a day). Here was the situation this morning:
The next morning we took off for the Litchfield National Park about 30 minutes away. Our first stop there was to see the Magnetic Termite Mounds. These mounds are very large, and there was a whole field of them with varying sizes of mounds. The area looked like a cemetery with headstones.
If you like fashion, photography, recipes, party decor or just about anything else in the world, you should definitely have a Pinterest account.
I broke; I've tried till my careful senses
We seem to take for granted that our chapters will always be there for us. Yes, many chapters date back to the 1800s, but with the way we’re treating our letters, that doesn’t mean that we can assume they’ll be there for us in the future. Being a member of a chapter doesn’t mean simply accepting a bid card, paying dues and having socials. I’m proud of my letters and what they stand for, but lately, I’ve been forced to ask myself what other people think letters stand for. There seems to be a growing stigma associated with Greek life, and this needs to change. Now.
like a sky. I love your spots,
It comes to me first
And we all know that any 'taboos' that exist on any subject will be brazenly flouted by the media; it's what they do. It's all about tearing down existing mores and standards and remaking our society to their plans. And as such, it's subversive.
or maybe it's my love of cooking that makes me drawn to
Breakfast was a T.C.A [egg, ground turkey, cheddar, avocado] breakfast burrito from Brother’s Burritos. Simple. Really simple. The kind of burrito you could totally make on your own but you don’t in a fit of laziness. That’s what this place is all about. The spicy salsa made the burrito.
Play three notes and you make a chord.
Add buttermilk till desired thickness
Before I attempt to articulate the hurdle, another example: in the fouth season of the West Wing. The President is faced with a genocide in the fictional African nation of Kundu and asks one of his staffers, "Why is an American life worth more than a Kundunese one?" The staffer responds, "I don't know sir, it just is." The power of this dialogue, for me, is the clear acknowledgement of the fallacy that we continue to treat as real: that the members of our group are worth more than the non-members.
So what's just concerned me is that there are three forms of cutlery. How, though, is it that the knife is the one to claim the collective naming rights of cutlery? The fork and the spoon are equals in this arrangement - why are they not called pokelery in honour of the fork? Or scooplery in honour of the spoon?
Oh, well. I’m going to buy my sister a ticket so she can come, because I can’t really invite her and then not pay for her ticket, and I’m going to enjoy going out with her, and I just won’t drink any wine.
All you have to do is leave a comment on THIS post by midnight on February 14. I will draw a name later in the week and send it off to the lucky winner.
Unless they are made of water-resistant paper, they will hold liquids for a very short time only.
Ornoy A. Intrauterine infections: Introductory comments. Reprod Toxicol 2005; ...
All of these works are quite distinct from Archie Granot’s approach to the visual interpretation of traditional prayers and texts as embodied in The Papercut Haggadah, but they are all examples of the vitality and variety of contemporary Jewish art and belief.
Hi All, Abi here filling in so apologies if anything's gone wrong! Leave us a comment & we'll try & put it right asap!
There are of course many other kinds of dictionaries: reverse dictionaries that organize the words differently, rhyming dictionaries, dictionaries of word origins, translation dictionaries, and then fun things like Ambrose Bierce’s Devil’s Dictionary, which is actually a work of satire masquerading as a dictionary that includes entries like the following:
Well, that's my current wishlist, is there any standalone YAs I should be adding to it? Are any of these titles on yours? If not, what is?
I am he, I am he who will sustain you.
1 raw
Did you really say J Street has only five Arab and Muslim donors? A partial listing quickly extracted from the U.S. Federal Election Commission shows more than 30 contributors, many with ties to Arab-American organizations.
5, When everything has cooled and you're ready to construct your cake, simply lay down a crêpe, spread a dollop of mousse on it, top with another crêpe and repeat. When the crêpe cake is completed, pop it in the fridge for a couple of hours to chill before slicing.
Great. I now had a concept for my story, and I figured, why not write this script for the contest? I started an outline for the story, and forwarded it to my friend. Again, he loved the concept. He pointed out a few potential holes that needed filling, but encouraged me nonetheless. As the plot thickened, something strange happened. I would refine my outline, and define the “Plot Points”, and then I would hear that the twist I was planning actually happened in real life! Not once, but almost daily.
* The nineteen year old single mother of seven who managed to wheedle her way onto the front row of FIVE Paris Fashion Week shows before being carted off by security. "I thought it was a little curious" said fashion weirdo Karl Lagerfeld "that this rather wide hipped woman in a velour tracksuit was sitting next to the beautifully emaciated socialite daughter of Baroness Helga Of The Prussian Hinterland and Nicki Minaj but I assumed she was making a whimsical statement about the New Poverty."
Ipinaliwanag niya sa isang sulat at pinaalala ko lang sa kanya, well, bata si Mai baka yung akala niyang gawain na simple ay hindi niya narealize ang implications. I’m more or less convinced that she realizes what was done.
but to stand in the dark, under the stars,
We hope you're having a fabulous start of your week.
New Orleans, for example, which was voted the number one dirtiest city in the U.S., is known for its yearly Mardi Gras, the clean up of which is of epic proportions.
‘Christopher just spelled the end of Tony, his family – everything. From my standpoint, as the architect of the series, Tony put up with him for too long.’
Sometimes he would look at me and i could see it in his eyes………….. but i would just turn away!
Writing: B+
I hear music in the car and I think of Mr. Curry's eyes and his hands on me and how he tells me he loves me like he is thirsty and I am water and I think of our four children and their beautiful bodies moving in this world and their spirits so well loved and I know that I have everything. I also know that medications and insurance and these kinds of things that us poor people are so obsessed with talking about have the power to ruin our lives. If my husband takes the wrong magic pill because a psychiatrist should be evaluating him but instead an I-Phone is, that could ruin our lives. If he got sick enough badly enough he could end up hospitalized or leaving me or forcing me to leave him. All I can do is work full time and that is not full time enough.
“Yoochun ah, a present for…us…” I said.
I have been enjoying a delightful correspondence with a young American gentleman - I won't say who he is save to say he is a very Klassy person! With great politeness, and not a little old-fashioned Southern charm, he asked if he might call me 'Camilla'. I was very touched - and of course would be pleased for him to do so, for that is my name. I have, however, disliked abbreviated familiarities for many a year - since, in fact, I was engaged to The Honourable Charles Royston Nicks (who, incidentally, later claimed to be a second cousin of the divine Stevie Nicks). Charles was fond of calling me 'Cammi' which I thought was because I rode my Grandfather's Model 40, 350cc SOHC Norton - the 'Cammy' Norton (see picture of Jimmy Simpson's Model 40, no.37, at the 1934 Dutch TT - my Grandfather's shoulder can be seen on the extreme right).
According to a statement provided by the Business Journal, “In 1972 Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis, U.S. Senator Robert Taft, Jr., and Sam Beard founded the Jefferson Awards for Public Service to establish a ‘Nobel Prize’ for public community service. The Minneapolis/St. Paul Business Journal has teamed up with the Jefferson Awards for the third year in a row to highlight companies and organizations in the Twin Cities that are giving back.
I follow so many wonderful blogs….but can choose only 5 blogs to pass the award along to, so here are 5 out of my many, many, many “favorites” (I’m not sure how many followers each one has…some may have more than 200 ??? And I see that several blogs I follow have already gotten this award in the past few days, too, so I won’t include those)
We are in exile
scheme.
Bring it here
PLFM reader SS had gone off to college her freshman year and found herself feeling a bit lonely. Late one night she decided to post an ad on an online dating site, but soon thereafter started participating in a variety of social clubs on campus.
Cook the bacon in a large skillet over medium heat. Once the bacon is cooked, drain it on a paper towel then chop it up. Remove all but 1 tsp of bacon grease from the skillet. Add 1 tsp olive oil to the bacon grease in the skillet over medium high heat. Season the chicken with sea salt, freshly cracked pepper, garlic powder, and dried basil, to taste on both sides. Once the skillet is HOT, add the seasoned chicken thighs and cook for 5-6 minutes on each side, or until cooked through. Remove the chicken from the skillet, cover with a tin foil tent, and set aside.
They must in turn post this and send something they make
Hey look! It's another year of NaBloPoMo under my belt! Does it make me look fat? Please don't answer that.
This is my Koden-gaes: Giving a token in acknowledgement of an obituary gift.
I thought I’d reward my 10 miles by having the left over Namaste pizza instead of pumpernickel bread. I topped the plate off with hot sauce. The veggies which made up the omelet were chopped asparagus and broccoli.
If this argument were successful and further developed, it might demonstrate that the Humean Naturalist must choose between the alternatives of Naturalism in combination with something like Intelligent Design on the one hand, and Theism on the other. That would be an impressive and legitimate ad hominem argument.
On the other hand, in other organisations, where I have really felt a part of the team, achieved bylines, felt appreciated and actually did the same work as competently as others in the office…I was not paid.
MajPeterLerner: @Chez_Em you should be tweeting #Egypt Иран: План сухопутной войны MajPeterLerner: @JudyMozes רפואה שלמה Дьявол в деталях Soccer Dad’s Middle East Media Sampler Long overdue Former IAEA officials worry Iran won’t get nukes Fail Of The Day: Borat Anthem Mistakenly Played At Medal Ceremony France: Here Comes the Whitewash Report: Iran offered Egyptian 50 million pounds to attack Israeli ship in Suez
Think of it like this… some of us (from what spirit keeps repeating in my head is about 100,000 or so of us walking around on earth right now) have hybrid DNA within us. Direct from our star cluster/celestial daddy’s (and it is so much more than just Pleiadian energy, that just happens to be my genetic coding, there are many others.)
Michael continues to keep growing. He’s still not quite grown up, though. Oh, I sure would like to discuss some potty and breastfeeding thoughts…maybe another day.
3.) Haven't lived in New York for a long long time and can't change the address from citycenternyc. Feel like a poseur.
Anwaar: Oh don’t say that. She’s just…
in the otherwise motionless
My fingertips are sore from the putting of pins through fabric all weekend. It hurts even to knit, but I persist. Although, there is an increasing chance that I will not be able to attend the festival this coming weekend as my contact are being very un-contactly and not providing me with information that is vital to my being there.
About a year and half ago, we were talking about traveling and how much we want to see and experience in this world. Every year for the past few years we go to the life is good unschooling conference. Every time we go some where for that length of time, the kids miss the cats and home. We love being at home so much, but we love going places so much. Well I had heard of families living on the road full time and started reading more about it. It looked amazing! Exactly what we were looking for, to be able to travel without really leaving home.
"Yes of course I will vote for separation. We need our independence. We need to be free from the Arabs," said Justin Victor, reverend at All Saints Episcopal Cathedral in the southern capital Juba, as his congregation sang inside.
I was texting back and forth with a guy who was subletting his apartment and we were settling on where to meet. He chose a plaza near the place and said he’d pick me up there. I texted back, “OK. Je suis le schtroumpf violet” and waited. When he showed up, he looked my way and smiled and smiled and smiled as he walked directly towards me.
In the Breakup War, I’m Winning
Stamps- GStudio and PTI Fillable Frames #5
Endlessly by Kiersten White
Every man’s idea of a real woman is going to vary based on their own character and life experiences. Their perception of this type of woman will always be based on the fact that her self-image is the same or higher than his. The truth of the matter though, is that real women are waiting on men of all ‘levels’ to rise to the occasion and take a chance. How do I know this? Because I’ve been there more than once. There have been numerous times when quality girls have shown interest in me and my self-image wouldn’t allow me to pursue them. It wasn’t until I started understanding myself and starting on a quest to become a real man who I was able to pursue my wife, and even then I had some issues to resolve from within before I could consider making her my wife.
...where some very important king guy walks in, with much pageantry and ado. And they show him variously glowing at the reception, and then looking almost a bit shy or weary of it. We found it so unexpected and humanizing, and we had NO IDEA what was going on, and now we're curious. Help!
Over the next several hours, we were sucked into Barman's world. Al and I are still trying to wrap our minds around the debauchery and lawlessness we took part in while spending the day with Barman and his friends. Even now, weeks later, one of us will occasionally stare into space and say, "What the f*ck was that..."
I pulled those little teeny balls of yum out of their shell and stuck them through my now one finger tip width of a space.
(3) It supplies gluten for a framework for the mixture.
Very important: you have to set up your "mi sen plaz"...all your ingredients in a row, just like this. Your grated carrots, your chopped cilantro, the sliced scallions, I added with some fresh chopped mint, your dressing, combining them with the fresh ginger slices, and of course your cut limes.
And so, back to our own little haven, a couple of miles down the coast, and a day well spent, treasure found, aching muscles, but a sense of worthwhile achievement.
IDs of 2.5 million dead Americans abused annually, new study shows – Dead or alive, your identity is always at risk: New data shows that fraudsters use the Social Security numbers and other personal data of more than 2 million deceased people in the U.S. annually in order to get credit card and cell phone services each year under phony names.
This video contains copyrighted material the use of which has not always been specifically authorized by the copyright owner. We are making such material available in our efforts to advance understanding of environmental, political, human rights, economic, democracy, scientific, and social justice issues, etc. We believe this constitutes a ‘fair use’ of any such copyrighted material as provided for in section 107 of the US Copyright Law. In accordance with Title 17 U.S.C. Section 107, the material on this site is distributed without profit to those who have expressed a prior interest in receiving the included information for research and educational purposes.
Being British just had to share this photo of such a beautiful couple, just for any of you who haven't seen it yet lol! I remember watching his parents get married nearly 30 years ago, where does the time go! Now I do feel old!! Didn't Kate look gorgeous and William so handsome!
Sacramento Classic: ROUND ONE: 1) Travis Briscoe (Edgewood, N.M.) 88.5 points on Bring It (Chumley Long Cattle, Co), $2,730. 2) Elliot Jacoby (Fredericksburg, Texas) 88.0 points on Shot Gun Willy (Holman Bucking Bulls), $1950. 3) Bryan Richardson (Dallas, Texas) 87.5 points on Zipcode (Sis & Stan’s Bucking Bulls), $1,170. 4/5) Austin Meier (Kinta, Okla.) 87.25 points on Facial Fear (Don Kish Bucking Bulls), $624. 4/5) Chris Shivers (Jonesville, La.) 87.25 points on Kick Butt (Cosca/Brown Bucking Bulls), $624.
Here is the official announcement about Mariah Carey coming to HSN — news that we broke over the weekend.
Well, first I have found a new obsession - Pinterest. Haven't discovered it yet? It's amazing...ly addictive. I'm not really sure how to describe it - kind of an online bulletin board of all the most amazing projects, products, ideas and more you could ever want to see. There are DIY projects I'd love to try, recipes I want to make, things I would love to wear & quotes that make me think. Depending on my mood, it's either a wonderful place of great inspiration or a terrible place of "I could never be as amazing as the person who made that". I try to stay away on the latter days. But if you're looking for a place for great ideas - that's your place.
Although there were some holes in Tania's story, such as the fact that she referred to her husband Dave as her fiance from time to time, people were instantly taken by her story and the way she was able to go on with her life.
Sounds a trite story, but the shocker is that many Christians are attracted to this spiritually dysfunctional romance and worse, are attempting to give Christian applications to its demonic premise suggesting this be acceptable “Christian” discussion. Some Christian reviewers on Christian Internet sites are using the story to initiate Bible "studies" and discussion on so-called “Christian” principles to be drawn from it. A new “Christianized” twist on demonic deception is invading Christian values!
According to History Project Director Charles Denson, “The original Luna Park was a visual delight, a ‘grotesquely delightful’ storybook fantasyland filled with hundreds of towers, domes, spires, and minarets, all decorated with thousands of electric lights. It was known as the ‘Electric Eden,’ a city ‘sketched in flame.’ Our exhibit details the park’s history, from opening day in 1903 to the dramatic fire that destroyed it forty years later.”
By the way, I predict that I am not going to eat the chocolate in the next hour. And I know I’m right because I can control my arm. (With difficulty!!)
By Kristin Samuelson – Tribune reporter
I came across a shirt yesterday. A man’s dress shirt, fine white cotton,athletic cut, french cuffs, beautifully made. It was David’s favorite shirt, it fit him well. It showed his wide shoulders, long body, and small waist to best advantage. He looked damn good in it. Nobody else could ever wear that shirt.
In July, Kevin Sack at the New York Times wrote that during the 2008 campaign and the runup to the passage of Obamacare, Obama had “mischaracterized a central anecdote about his mother’s deathbed dispute with her insurance company,” leaving “the clear impression that his mother’s fight was over health benefits for medical expenses.” In other words, he made audiences believe that his mother didn’t have health insurance as she fought ovarian cancer, when she did. There’s a three-letter word for this. It begins with “L,” ends with “E,” and has the ninth letter of the alphabet in the middle.
Some of the scenes were hauntingly beautiful if not completely surreal. Dementors hovered in the sky and were blasted back by an amazing blue light, the magic was literally in the air and it was all very breathtaking.
And got suspended from school
Fringe – hair that’s over your face. They called them bangs in Anne of Green Gables, so maybe that’s the word still used.
Joe Maddon doesn't want to believe he is doing anything controversial. Bringing people together shouldn't be controversial. You know how he came up with this idea? He was in Hazleton last Christmas and was invited to a pot luck lunch at the home of the De La Rosas, a Dominican family in town. There, he saw children running around, banging into each other, inventing games, being rowdy, playing and laughing, and it all felt so inexpressibly familiar. This was his own childhood. And he could not help but think that if people around town just could see this, could connect this way, that Hazleton could regain its magic.
Next a huge Thank you to Kathy Jones for sharing all her fabulous projects with us this week!! Today Kathy has a great card ensemble for you created with the November Release Stamps. You can see more of Kathy's work everyday on Kathy's Blog Inspired to Stamp.
That's your warning. If you're already feeling uncomfortable, it's probably best to stop reading now.
Ólafur Arnalds' original motion picture soundtrack for Sam Levinson's feature film debut 'Another Happy Day', starring Ellen Barkin and Demi Moore, will see a worldwide release via UK modern classical label Erased Tapes Records on February 27, 2012.
The black replacements for those 9,000 qualified white water-engineers were so uneducated that the Water Research Commission had to create a cartoon-like manual to teach sewage-plant operators with SYMBOLS instead of in writing, showing them how to carry out tests to establish clean-water safety levels…
I hope you enjoy the video below and that inspires you to have a little fun at your work this week. And, yes, the blonde dancing near the front is me.
Reading the author's blog, and this piece on Salon.com, I have to say that I agree with the author's opinion and thoughts on how the reporting was done. At the very least you could say that the entire concept of the book was twisted. In all honesty, I think the author was too nice in calling the various "reporters" lazy, because it was just sheer stupidity.
For those who took the oath to defend this great nation of ours ….
The issues keeping Asian males from being viable sustainable stars in film are also what are keeping Asian females from being the same. Most prominent roles for Asian women have been relegated to action-oriented roles, but hardly the main romantic lead. While film is still a revolving door for women, television showed more promise in featuring and sustaining more Asian female faces.
“It’ll be okay. Just listen to me and do exactly what I say.”
It makes me feel at ease
Domaine de la Poultiere (Vernou-Sur-Loire): I can't believe I'm wine tasting at 8:45am. Greeted by a sweet dog. Nice wines. Bought a lovely white for dinner.
When the reason for their training is finally revealed, the angel/warrior team find themselves thrust into a world they know nothing about. Matt takes over the life of Daniel, a young man with a great deal of baggage. Emily becomes Liz, a girl living in a remote village who relies on nothing more than her own strength to survive. A violent storm erupts one night, and framed in the window of Liz's establishment is a frightening face. Let in by the soul of a Good Samaritan, the two visitors bring with them a past full of secrets that could literally change an angel's path and a warrior's plans.
Wonton skins as you need
I have a Mother's Day card to share with you today. I put this together using one of my favorite Wplus9 sets, Woodgrain Silhouettes.
I had such great hopes for my scrapping weekend, projects all lined up on the floor b/c I've had some great brain storms, but they will have to wait I guess until Monday. I do have 2 Jillibean Soup layouts to share with you. One is based on the April sketch challenge and the other was something I had to scrap when I saw the saying on it! LOL. I used a bunch of my Jillibean Soup buttons on these as Jillibean challenged their readers with buttons this month. I actually have a project all laid out on my floor that is really cool, but it needs another hour before I can share that one.
Conversations by Luce Irigarary (London and New York, NY, Continuum, 2008).
With that said, I lived in the same house I do now. With my mother, too. It is central to the dream, the house. My mother never appeared, I just know through conversation in the dreamscape that she was there. Meanwhile, there was a roommate who is not real – Judith. She was tall and very thin, dark hair and eyes with an aquiline nose. Jewish, like me. She was beautiful, but absent for the majority of the dream. Maybe she was the personification of my Jewish self, that I never determined.
FARIA Rev Braz 2002; .
I'm not sure about that. When pressed to answer their own question, most people say things like "basic math" or "how to read" and then have trouble thinking of much else. Even if I conceded that these two things were absolutely necessary for every person to know, that would hardly justify me sending my kids to school, as schools try to teach a whole lot more than just those things.
I thought it would be interesting to share the nutritional value on one of my favorite snacks. The word Edamame means “Beans on Branches” and it grows in clusters on bushy branches. To retain the freshness and its natural flavor, it is generally parboiled and quickly-frozen. In East Asia, the soybean has been used for over two thousand years as a major source of protein. FYI, you can always sprinkle a little flavor on them for an extra twist…..like cayenne for spicy or lemon pepper for zest.
Despite so much having happened since then I still find it weird how little I recall of that weekend in February. I know I was enormous. I remember I napped a lot. I know I took a packed hospital bag with me just in case we did a mad dash back to town. But other than that I'm hazy.
There's rules in everything we do, and while the best chefs and the best authors know that sometimes rules CAN be bent or broken...there's generally good sense in following them.
The answer to that is why business people can “sell high”, if they’re lucky. That is the value creation process.
In total, R195 581.45 of taxpayers’ money was spent on upgrading the security at Mthethwa’s private residence, as we reported last week.
1 hellhound
All this is why, in some cases, a delay of just two months at manuscript stage can sometimes lead to the pub date being bumped by a year, to make sure that everything comes together.
A lot of this is generalizing what I have seen in individuals, and probably not as accurate as I would wish. I really would like to get input and write an article about women who enable and some idea of why, and how to break the pattern ... Like the Ladies of the Club that was written by a number of us sharing our experiences in order to find a pattern for the problem and for the breaking away. These women need help as well, and any little thing we can do to help is worthwhile.
Going to a Chinese (Or any other cultures) Restaurant and eating food from another culture:
Whilst not every older worker wants to work in a call centre the study underlines the need for employers to recognise, understand and hopefully act upon some of the diverse range of strengths that older people can contribute in the workplace. Studies such as this also may help older people themselves in strengthening their case for employment.
1/4 teaspoon ground cloves
Happy 4th of July everyone!! So, I'm still around, but posting infrequently. Spent the past few days at the new house painting. I'm super excited and ready to get moved in, but we are still waiting on the floors to be installed. Go figure!
The half-built structure, which looms high above other homes on 35th St., is hidden behind wooden boards.
1237. – Lunch @ JG Domestic (Philadelphia, PA) –
24. Outro
The use of marriage is symbolic, not necessarily prescriptive, and certainly reflects an ideal that cannot be realistic in our fallen world (125). Moreover, the authors argue that the text is a central pivoting point for the themes of the letter, marriage serving as a useful conventional metaphor (121). The text turns the convention of marriage on its head: “The husband is head of his wife as Chris is head of the majestic and heavenly church. Human ‘wifely’ behavior within the church becomes an indicator of the community’s dislocation as an apparently conventional but nevertheless heavenly body” (127). Thus, in taking the passage at face value, we miss the point.
Mix, whip egg whites until stiff. Add sugar and vanilla. Mix.
Of especial note here are Conte’s “Black Spirits,” with Nailah Porter on vocals and Logan Richardson on alto sax; “Shiva,” with Melanie Charles on vocals and Logan Richardson on alto sax; the dancefloor-ready instrumental “Bantu,” featuring Magnus Lindgren on flute; the sadly too-short “All Praises to Allah,” featuring on Magnus Lindgren on reeds and Logan Richardson on alto sax; and “Ra In Egypt,” with Gaetano Partifilo on alto sax and Flavio Boltro on trumpet.
We decided to divide the collection in to a few stories. These photos that my boyfriend took of me on an early morning are a part of the new jersey range. The new collections should start dropping in on Bengt from Sunday forward, I can’t wait to share the rest of the photos with you!
promotions to drive new and active customer growth. We will also be focused on further increasing our Internet sales penetration toward 50 percent as well as refinancing our long-term debt with lower interest rates.”
When you ask them one simple question – how are you? How is it going?
“I addressed the court and sought asylum and entrance into Great Britain” said Geert Wilders, the head of the PVV (Party for Freedom), which have 9 of the 150 seats in parliament. Wilders is the director of the film “Fitna”, which advocates the stance that Islam equals violence.
Now you gotta alla your shit for sale
Party Favors for your thanksgiving gathering. Easy enough to do: Use a knife to cut open the top, then scoop out the insides. Make the handle with a bendable vine or branch from outside. Pierce a tiny hole breaking the gourd skin and push in the vine to hold.Add candies,...
So, I'm saying YES to the read-a-thonny goodness. I'm going to be at work for six days out of the seven, but I'm going to make every moment count. I can read on the counter at the shop - the quieter the town, the more I'll get read - as well as before and after work, and right through my day off on Tuesday. I might not finish a book a day, but anything that encourages me to stop playing online/article hopping/watching catch-up TV/staring at the wall/snoozing and pushes me gently back to my reading has to be a good thing, right?!
I can tell you things are getting better since my first post. The husband has done a one-eighty and completely fallen in love with her. My daughter and son are managing better now that I’ve given them some tools to avoid play that quickly turns too rough. “DOWN” and “OW” are working like magic charms. Ladybug and Trevor have more fun in the back yard with the doofus dog than all the hula-hoops and jump-ropes combined and I found the miracle “pacifier” for puppies that keeps her busy for just long enough for me to make dinner/post on my blog/fold laundry. Those chewy bone thingies. Yeah. I’m pretty sure that’s the official name for them.
Hey guys! With only a couple till Christmas I’m looking for new ways to promote my shop. I’ve already marked some of my items on sale for Christmas. And I’ve also decided to offer some coupon codes and freebies throughout the month of December.
And the driver is a nursing sister she met once whilst participating in a hospice bereavement workshop thing. She often tried to donate blood, but was always told that she needed it more than the blood bank. And once when she had tried to sign up for Life Line she was rousted out before the introductory course. Quite perplexed why she must surely be one of the few volunteers to be denied membership to this human flotilla she asked them why and was told that basically it was a service where one listened and as people expressed themselves to the listener then they would come to their own decisions. Whereas they had immediately ‘diagnosed’ her as one who would say upon hearing about continued abuse to leave the bastard, just leave, now. She was most impressed by their astuteness in reading her character.
This Ritual is amazing in its own and i have seen many people who has got the benefit out of it.
Easy going ...Control freak.
Because this is a WORK computer, they won't transfer over non-business items like Tweetdeck, iTunes, etc. This is understandable. So, one of the first things I did today was install iTunes. As you may have heard, a new operating system (or "OS" if you want to sound all techie-like) was released from Apple earlier this week. After I installed iTunes on ye olde hard drive, I plugged in my iPhone to sync it like I do every day and BLEEP BORP BLEEK, a little robot inside my computer said, "YOU MUST UPGRADE! NEW O.S. BEEP BEEP. COMPUTING!!" or something like that. I dutifully did as my Apple Computer Master instructed me, including turning on iCloud and backing my phone up to it at 11:37am (FORESHADOWING!), and it seemed as if all might be okay.
The sixth book is intriguing and fantastic to read. I like that we were taken back in time to see the earlier members of the MacGregor family. The firery MacGregors are not a thing from the past. Their stubbornness is as old as time. You got to see how they were spread out and finally made it to America where some will stay permentanly.
SCC: Caro’s imaginary ‘kill list’ in Rendez, and Rob’s similar one from the multistorey at the end bring the book full circle. Was that a deliberate linkage – another kind of mirroring?
My family is quite literally and figuratively suffocating me today with their narrow minded, mindless and completely inane bullshit.
TIP 3. You can achieve further savings by investing in other energy-saving technologies. For example, Centre Parcs invested in LED lighting and automated kitchen extraction controls, achieving savings of between 10% and 20%.
Best Library: Not sure, I loved Dickinson's, but that's also the last one I saw...
Besides being very talkative, she is not interested in sleeping at all.
(At least I hope he is, please keep him in your prayers!)
80 Calories per Muffin
4. Drunkenness. Paul concludes his list with two terms that refer to the wild drinking parties held in honor of pagan gods, particularly the god Bacchus. Drunkenness and orgies were part of pagan culture; they still are. And the church has never been immune to these acts of the sinful nature.
public services/services
QUESTION: If Total Depravity is true than how is it possible for mankind to do so many good things?
In Dallas I departed from the plane and hurried to my gate. From behind me I heard a very emphatic “Steve Weber”. It was Dave, a friend from first grade, who “just happened” to be traveling from Springfield MO through Dallas, to a business meeting in Florida! At the sight of him I thanked God and was greatly encouraged. Frankly I can’t recall but am practically certain we would have hugged each other!
Mr Obama used a news conference today to trumpet his personal role and imply that his Republican opponent Mr Romney, who in 2008 expressed reservations about the wisdom of sending troops into Pakistan, would have let bin Laden live.
ever find a perfect song for her,
1 small red bell pepper, chopped
I leave for Scotland on Tuesday and with any luck I will have a chance this weekend to write a few posts for while I'm gone. Prepare to be bored to death by my photos of castles and pipers!
The View of Modern Medical Science
She also asked where in the city she would like to purchase a house from....I told her close to me, lol.
As we gather around our Thanksgiving feast our family takes the time to go around the table & each person says what they are thankful for. It's sometimes silly & funny and other times serious & thoughtful. But we all "get" each other & for that I'm thankful.
These local representatives would would be elected to act on strict mandates from their voters and be thrown out if they vote against their mandates, so that the working class majority in Auckland would control the running of the city.
And I will raise him up,
Big changes are happening..
As a group promoting a transition to strong communities able to thrive in a lob carbon future, Transition Newcastle strongly opposes the construction of a fourth coal terminal in Newcastle. We need to focus on finding alternatives to a carbon based economy and protecting our food security rather than expanding the coal industry.
Case closed. Now if only someone would execute the fat son of a bitch there would be justice.
Its obviously not for everyone but he has reached a very high level of fitness so this is a cost effective way of making it a harder workout and a way of conditioning the cardiovascular system without a trip to Kenya!
Sandwiches with dollops of mayo were always my weakness.
Before your interview try not to eat or drink anything that has a tendency to linger, such as garlic, onions or in the case of drink no alcohol. Strong odours take a while to disappear. Both you and your interviewer will be able to notice it, which could be an embarrassing distraction!
With more challenges, pokemon, the ability to reface teh gym leaders with stronger pokemon, and additions to the story, these games will not disappoint.
Here's where YOU Come in!
6 Lady Luck 3:36
As a memento for the occasion, they received championship t-shirts. He picked out a really big one. I don't argue when he does that. If it covers his body and doesn't have swear words, I just roll with it.
Weird. They panned to Little Richard in the audience.
So, with signs of true remorse, months of love and respect and honesty, do you forgive and give a second chance?
heart leaking something so strong
And as much fun as I have playing with the dog, I know that I can't have a pet right now, no matter what people say. I just really don't have the time and my work requires me to go places and work long hours. I think it's unfair and unkind to take on a pet when you can't commit to care for it wholeheartedly. Since it was my last day to take care of the dog, I decided to spend an extra hour playing with him, having him fetch that tennis ball and letting him run up and down the park. And when we got home, I gave him two full scoops of food instead of the scoop and a half. He's earned it. And while I'm a little sad to see him go home, it's going to be nice to be able to sleep in a little longer and eat my meals without feeling guilty about the dog looking at me with his sad, pleading eyes.
Another area where the screens differ is sunlight legibility – the HTC One X is very good for an LCD and the excellent brightness contributes to that, but the non-reflectivity of the AMOLED screen gives the Samsung Galaxy S III the edge. In fact, the Galaxy S III emerges from our tests as the best outdoor performer we have seen to date
Spoon batter into cupcake papers, filling cups about 2/3 full. Bake for 25 minutes (15 minutes for mini cupcakes). or until a toothpick inserted into the center comes out clean. Remove from oven and cool.
be getting rid of the dyes.
They have provided lunch, Dairy Queen Drinks (read Small Town Texas), beautiful office supplies and other fun odds and ends! A few kids had brought in candy and little pieces of art work!
Sit back and grab a cup of your favorite stimulant drink, and I'll bring you up to speed on a law you may not have heard about. Or if you've heard about it, you may think it doesn't apply to you. Read on-- it applies to everyone.
“They put me on television. And the whole thing broke loose. It was wild, I tell ya for sure.” ~Elvis Presley
WEAR TIME
job
These days, making the average Mac or PC do anything other than what the operating system and installed applications permit means installing even more tools to do that. You have to get a compiler or interpreter. You have to learn the operating system’s now bloated and complex API. Everything seems much harder to start. Because we have a higher expectation of what a programme does, your first efforts at writing “Hello World” to the screen aren’t going to impress anybody. They won’t even impress you.
At our house, there is an ongoing rivalry about a highly important, life or death topic: Dessert Superiority. In a nutshell, the man of this house believes chocolate (dark) reigns supreme over all other forms of sweet treats. If (hypothetically) I were to offer to make dark chocolate cake, dark chocolate chip cookies, or brownies every single day, not only would he not object, but he would probably think he died and went to Dessert (and Perfect Wife) heaven.
Actually, yes, it will. I've put the kids to bed, I'm having a cup of Get Some Zzzzs, and I'm watching "Ace of Cakes." The cats and dog are sleeping, The Man is out for a drink at the new beer bar that just opened down the street, and I'm weighing the options of sleep vs. Stephen Colbert.
-I've also started looking for a car. Although I love our apartment, it is super far from my work. We're also constantly wishing we had one. So many fun places nearby for day trips, Napa, Tahoe, Santa Cruz, Carmel, the list goes on. Unlike NYC, in SF, we've decided, a car is a must. My dream would be one of those new cute little Fiats in mint green. But my budget says prob not gonna happen...someday...
The Ooks of Hazzard--Kids
I have some exciting news: D and I leave for our honeymoon on Thursday!!!!! We are going to Paris, Bruges and Amsterdam for 11 days! I haven't really done much travelling before because I've haven't had much of an opportunity. I have gone to Israel twice before and Canada once, but that's it. D has done a ton of travelling and he has made a super detailed itinerary for us to go by. We are spending 6 days in Paris (including a Shabbos), 1 day in Bruges, and 4 days in Amsterdam (including a Shabbos). We are packing really light so that we can bring back plenty of souveniers;) I won't be updating the blog while we are gone since I won't have much internet access so y'all will just have to wait until I get back to see everything! I promise I will share all of my outfits and treasures that we bring back:)
Well for the next two weeks I’ll be thinking about Just Jhoom! but from foreign shores. Or maybe not so foreign – because I am going back to my birthplace – Kenya.
"Certainly!" And he made his way to the door where he flicked a switch. Instantly, the room was plunged into darkness. His voice came out of the gloom. "Behold! The electric dark bulb!"
This is 2 days worth of work, I've just about finished with the pencil rendering (some trees to be added to the horizon), then it will be sealed, then I'll get into the acrylic washes. I'm working with it leaning up against the dining table while I sit on the floor in front, probably not the best way to go about it, but I couldn't get it on the easel at the right height to sit at. The canvas is 91cm square, and I intend to have a fair bit of white space. I haven't worked out how I'm going to incorporate the text of the poem yet though, what style writing and whether I should do it in pencil, or pen and ink, though I think it should be either grey or sepia toned. Beauty's hair seems to be taking on a slightly tree-like look which I quite like, though it wasn't intentional. I struggled with the folds of the sheet though, I REALLY can't do draping cloth! It has to be finished by the end of the week, so no time to stop and procrastinate about which way I should go, which is probably a blessing!
A demain mes trés, trés, trés chers amis for the weekly round-up. I'm off to the market on yet another superb spring day.
I received an awaited wish
Here's a beautiful example of using a great design fairly literally. Tomorrow, we'll take a look at an example of varying a layout a bit more!
I feel like a blog slacker, but I'm finally going to update with all of the fun stuff I have been making and doing over the past couple of months.
To see the logical conclusion of this cultural self-hatred, we need look no further than Britain, a country that has taught generations of its citizens the evils of its imperial history. Sure, the British were the first to abolish slavery, a major source of innovation in science and technology and critical defenders of freedom against Nazi Germany. But what’s more important is that British imperialism exploited foreigners.
and the one to the right is
We love having them here but now they have gone back and we will see them again soon .
I am the pathfinder for that. One only has to know nothing like me in order to believe it firmly and unshakably.
From Marquis to Marry by Amelia Grey
Post and tweet about your award. If possible, have one of your friends or colleagues tweet during the awards ceremony. Also share and re-tweet your fellow award recipient’s posts. Be a good infertility colleague, Facebook friend and fellow IF twitterer.
Whilst times were good and they overhauled City’s 20 week lead at the top of the table, the two veterans came in for suitable praise. Scholes has been formidable in his six months out of retirement and Giggs has typically found the crucial touch whether it be the match-winning goal against Norwich or the pinpoint cross against Chelsea – all contributing to the steady accumulation of points.
Growin' Up
Oh yes and finally, but not least, congratulations to Sir Terry Pratchett for his much deserved knighthood, the man is a genius and not afraid to stand up for what he believes in from humanism to Alzheimer's research and if you haven't read any of his books, why not?
Perhaps that is why I called her GRAND mother...she was the BEST!
I went to see Joseph and the Amazing Technicolor Dreamcoat last night. First of all, the show was wonderful. But second of all, I was thrilled to have a Brownie a la mode that was gluten free. The staff was great when my mom called to order the tickets (I think she asked them about 20 gluten related questions- and yes that is one of the many reason I love her). And the wait staff was great too.
The excavation at Gor Khatri, which continued for four years and published in the British Journal ‘Current World Archaeology’ with the title as ‘The deepest and biggest excavation in the world’ revealed 20 layers that provide a complete profile of the city ranging from British down to the pre Indo-Greek era.
2 tbs. Curry Powder
I'm noticing that a lot of my choices are non-fiction and/or educational. This one is all about the wife of Chiang Kai-Shek, the first President of the Republic of China (Taiwan). Apparently she was something of a power-house and by all accounts, one helluva interesting lady so I thought why not take the time to learn something about the history and formation of my husband's country of origin from the perspective of one of the most powerful women at that time.
Tonight, as I sat on bamboo drums and the play (The Broken ) was continuing to develop before the audience, my mind quieted and my hearing heightened. All too soon, this listening halted. Thought interrupted. Heeding to the ponderings of my ever-wandering mind, I began to process what sound designing has done for me. While it is true that a sound designer is a servant to the story of the play and the production being presented, I also believe that the sound design serves the designer in some way.
MALLORY: It’s in my room. Want me to get it?
distribution if the budget,
2. The next day, add the ¼ cup olive oil, bay leaves, garlic cloves, 1 teaspoon salt to the pot and bring to the boil. Turn down the heat and simmer until the beans are tender (this can take from about 45 minutes up to 2 hours – it’s important to check and make sure they are cooked through.) Once they are cooked, drain the the beans and save the liquid for later use. Throw out the bay leaves and garlic.
I’m presenting at a meeting today, so the adrenaline will keep me warm enough to wear this dress without a jacket or sweater on top. Finally, a chance to show off the cute flutter sleeves!
Historian, speaker and columnist Jane Hampton Cook (http://www.janecook.com/) is the bestselling author of Stories of Faith and Courage from the Revolutionary War, The Faith of America’s First Ladies, and the upcoming co-authored book, Stories of Faith and Courage from Iraq (2009).
3rd Place: LBSU
It is our misfortune that the MSM, particularly the broadcast media, are the most powerful atomizer for such nebulous mists yet in history. Universities, and other brain-altering institutions that replaced church and grandpa, are also in that category. But they are not alone.
Simple sale - use coupon code NOREASON at checkout and receive 10% off your order. How fabulous is that?
A flourish is die cut from an aluminium can (love recycling) and the baubles from scrap papers decorated with tiny pearls, rhinestones and tiny bows.
We all have friends who have faded away, as we move into different phases of life. Memories and photos with those friends may make us wistful for the lost connections, but we can remember those times with fondness. We can hug and laugh when we run into these former friends, in person or online.
The Human League: Being Boiled (Fast Version)
Having nailed her flame-haired colours to this wonky mast, if I were Rebekah I’d divorce the rogue reporter defence forthwith, as it is the ultimate colander on an ocean of evidence to the contrary. Rumours continue to grow that she will herself soon enough be walking the plank.
I can’t keep giving out passes for incredulity about growth and social maturity. The south consistently votes against its own interests. “They don’t know no better” doesn’t work as an excuse in this case; these are conscious choices. If you’ll drift with me down memory lane, you’ll remember that Eddie Long and T.D. Jakes sure did lead Black folks to the George W. Bush promised land in 2004 precisely because G.W. was an avowed opponent of marriage equality. Bush wasn’t saying much about the dwindling prospects for middle- and lower middle-income Americans, but that was neither here nor there. At least he would ensure that the gays couldn’t marry. Unclouded by the haze of religious rhetoric, folks might have seen that GDubs’ ideological perspective would also ensure that they couldn’t marry either — because they couldn’t afford to once the economy tanked while they marched in opposition to a matter that had absolutely no bearing on their own lives.
- Frozen vegetables 750 g $2.98 each (Green giant)
Says Mr. Brown: “We bailed out Wall Street to avoid Depression, but three years later, millions of Americans are in a living hell. This is why they’re enraged, this why they’re assembling, this is why they hate you. Why for the first time in 50 years, the people are coming out in the streets and they’re saying, “Enough.”
I thought I wanted down and the sales ladies actually talked me out of that.
My favorite of this week’s reads was Shattered Dreams. I’ve had my eye on it for a good 6 months and it turned up free last week so I jumped on it. Regency England. A house party. A rake and an older brother with good intentions. Unfortunately, no one gives Elly enough credit…she has a deformed ankle, not brain damage…except for Brent. He believes in her and is sincere about it. There is also the matter of big brother Harrison’s struggles with his former love Cassie who is also present for the house party. The truth about a scandal and a murder attempt followed by Elly being kidnapped and nearly being killed herself. The truth comes out about the original agreement between Harrison and Brent that brought them together and Elly is devastated. The two merely exist for several months until Brent makes one final campaign for her heart.
It is possible to eat healthy foods without adding on extra costs. If you are trying to cut costs, there are some practical ways to keep food costs down, including:
Identify what it is you want, or don’t want for that matter and get clear about how you would like it to be. It is important to be specific. If your intention is to achieve a goal simply to “achieve it” then your probably not on the money. It’s the journey of going through the processes of the goal that makes up a big part of feeling “fulfilled” at the end of it. If your not happy with a certain area of your life then ask yourself, if you could be happy, what would happiness look like? A goal can be anything that matters to you; getting a new job, a new car, having a baby, getting married, finding love, loosing weight, getting healthy, buying a new TV, owning your own home, buy stocks, start a business, improve your inner balance, improve your relationship, make X amount of money (hint: what do you want the money for, that is, what will it bring you?), start a charity, travel, change your hair colour, make a new friend, finish a book, write a book, master a cooking class, stop using drugs or alcohol, get your drivers licence, get into college or university etc. etc. etc. The list goes on and on. So, what do you DO in step 1? Start by putting on a piece of music, something inspiring, grab your success journal and a pen, close your eyes and visualise exactly what it is you want. Spend a few minutes really getting clear and then start writing everything you want, all the goals you would like to achieve in the next year, 3 years, 5 years, 10 years, define your life on your terms and dare to dream. Even if you don’t believe you can achieve it, write it anyway, have fun with step 1.
You really don't have to read much more of her post to see where she is going with this. But if you took Geller's word as gospel, you might be tempted to jump to the same weak conclusion she has.
This game will be played using the Big Battle rules.
Like most people I go through periods of being really heavily into bands. For me it’s really akin to the infatuations I used to have with different girls when I was younger. When I love a band I want to hear everything they have ever released and with the same rose-tinted spectacles one has when falling in love with another person I lose all perspective and even love their average songs. It’s only later on that I realize that some of the songs I liked were actually nothing special, after my obsessive interest fades and I start to just like them as opposed to wanting to consume them like a voracious wolf.
As the Father sent Jesus, so Jesus sends us.
And yeah, she’s the collector
- Benishek loses a hypothetical rematch with McDowell 41-46
2 compatible
can we … adventure, create, belong?
When I was diagnosed with myeloma and eventually understood the sobering nature and reality of facing cancer, I remember sitting down with my wife and saying that I wanted to be able to look back on our journey and say that we did our best in fighting it, that we would let the experience only strengthen our family bond, and that we would live with dignity, courage, and faith, no matter the outcome.
During the day, I build myself up for another night out. Which scarf braids best into my hair? Draw the eyebrow on now or later? Lipstick now, lipstick later?
My favorite quotes from the last week include Nolan's response of "Because I love you so much" when Allen asked Nolan why he had called for Daddy to wipe his butt (yes, we're working on getting him to wipe his own). And Nolan saying that his Spiderman bike was faster than the car - followed by his insistence that we take his training wheels off so he can go faster...
On one occasion, I was standing in my kitchen having a seriously bad day not too long after Dominic was born and had finally came home from the hospital. I looked up to see a small dragonfly stuck to the screen of the window over our kitchen sink. It stayed there for a long time. I looked away, looked back and it was gone.
Hey girls (and guys),
Gary Dellaverson, the MTA’s chief financial officer, said that, under the agreement between the MTA and Related for the Hudson Yards project, if the 7 line subway extension isn’t available by 2014, there’d be a 50% rent holiday, some $32.5 million a year.
Either you get it or you don't.
The principal problem with breweries canning beer is the public perception of cans, in that its previously been the packaging method of choice for industrial lager. Discerning beer people associate cans with crap beer which is often overly filtered and carbonated. I'm sure this was just the same in the US though before breweries such as 21st Amendment and Oskar Blues pioneered the canning of craft beers. It took the first taste of one beer to change my mind. There is of course another problem in that canning equipment is expensive and contract canning requires large minimum quantities making it unfeasible for many small UK craft brewers.
1. Raving & Drooling
Produced by Beatle George Harrison in 1970, he also played guitar and harmonium. His lush production and arrangement added greatly to the enjoyment of this immensely infectious and beautiful song. It was released as a single and spent 8 weeks on the British charts and eventually reached number 23.
01 All The Way Down
I drew up this plan:
5. The Wedding Singer (1998)
We are down to the final two weeks after the elimination round tonight.
Timing issues
I probably drove everyone crazy jumping around and ooohing and aaahing about plants, but hey.... it was a wildflower hike!
Down into the depths of your very being,
“I created Muscle Car 1000 because there was nothing like it – a really fun car rally that caters to the upscale lifestyle. That last part was my wife’s idea, and it was a good one!”
Be you ever so high, you can be brought down by the vote of the common man.
...back to that night. I still can't believe this all went down in a bar. While my stubbornness was chugging away full steam ahead something somewhere jump started Jack's assertiveness. He didn't argue or plead he just grasped my arm again and pulled me to my feet. He didn't hurt me but I sure didn't have any choice in the matter.
The clock will be blocked
These are very helpful books in dealing with the big picture of the mixed bag which is our employee pool. These authors answer the important question of how we make the most of each generation’s abilities and also smooth over the wrinkles that appear as these generations mix in the workplace.
Dash is down to only Wild Bill Davis from the original lineup (which included Fred LeBlanc now in Cowboy Mouth and Hoaky Hickel on Bass and Jack Daniels). They probably aren't as drunk as yore but definitely still a great live band with tons of energy. Check 'em out if you don't have anything to see on Wednesday, at 12:00 a.m. They play Aces Lounge (222 E 6th St).
Hopefully I'll be able to put a few pictures up of my recent travels soon.
Although such race-centric strategy does not make sense, it has long been used by UMNO. UMNO cannot drop corruption because this has become the soul of the party. So, it has no choice but to rely on racial hatred. This is the only trump card that an UMNO blindsided by desperation sees in the pack. And this is why, UMNO will in all probability lose GE-13. It is still depending on the tricks pulled by Najib’s father in 1969, while the rest of Malaysia is already living in 2012.
Bosch GCM12SD – Brilliant Design, Super Saw, Reasonable Price
NOTE: This report was made 1 day after KONY 2012 went viral.
I’m cryptic, but you crack the codeMy heart skips a beat when you look at me
Geometry section was expanded and changed. It now has more material about shapes.
This afternoon, I was browsing pictures of the second wedding dress that Princess Kate wore. While the first dress was very classic with its romantic lace and long train (which reminds me of my mother's wedding dress from pictures that I've seen...and yes, my mom's waist was tiny like Kate's.) The second dress was made by the same designer, but was entirely different. No lace, lots of bling around the waist, and a circular hem. (forgive me for not knowing the correct designer terms....I'm ignorant in the world of fashion.) She looked fabulous in both dresses.
He turned on the headlight, and they took off a road that wound around a series of hills. Their bodies moved with the bike as they took each curve. Excitement warmed her body, even as the cold wind nipped at her hands.
These points aside, The Forgotten Waltz is exactly the sort of thing that prizes ought to reward: intelligent, strong and confident writing; something that investigates, with grace and a killing sharpness, just what it means to be fallibly human. Enright has a wonderful voice and the ability to create a tight, smart story one sentence at a time. There’s been a lot of discussion about whether she is literary or not. I tend towards the yes camp (after all, there are all kinds of similarities with Hanif Kureishi’s Intimacy—packaging excepted–not least being the astonishing grasp of the selfish single-mindedness of people who want something they are not supposed to want): literary overlapping with upmarket mainstream . Or is that just hedging my bets?
Good morning, all! Because I totally dropped the ball last week, I got this done yesterday evening. Yay!
I really like them. But alas there is no where to put them in my house.
That is where shopping the online sales is so brilliant. From the comfort of my mac I can find all the treasures I could possibly imagine - clad my feet in Louboutin, frock up in Erdem and stash my goodies in an Alexa by Mulberry. I can add as much as I like to my shopping basket without guilt because with one simple click the fun can be over and I won't have spent a cent or I can save my bits for later and take time to reflect on whether they are good value or not. Win/Win.
2. Select canned many fruits and tuna which are loaded in water, not oil or syrup, these are wonderful health food.
- first we get a desire – either our own or one we acquire from seeing others (eg. Colleague got a 40% hike – so should work to get that too!)
Thanks to Cindy for sending me a copy of Silver Phoenix and for doing the interview!
Interfaith dialogue became the fashion in North American universities some years ago and some unsuspecting Hindus were caught in this net. Now, the new phrase is “Hindu-Christian Dialogue”. In the Huffington Post article Mr. Malhotra readily admits that he has been corresponding with Jesuit priest and scholar Francis Xavier Clooney, who is also a Professor of Divinity at Harvard University (USA) and that since 2010 this Jesuit scholar has been reading and commenting on Malhotra’s new book Being Different. This seemingly cosy relationship was replicated in the recent talk at Harvard university and which the present writer has critiqued in an article “Rajiv Malhotra & Francis Clooney: Just friends or best friends?”. Malhotra being an autodidact needed to consult with Clooney, in addition to his committment to interfaith dialogue. The far more experienced and well-trained Clooney had no difficulty in flattering Malhotra into thinking that he was a superior and updated version of Swami Dayananda Sarasvati and Swami Vivekananda! This alone should have sent out alarm signals to Malhotra but that did not appear to be the case. A Hindu who cannot see the Greek who comes bearing gifts, is showing the height of naivete in thinking that a ‘dialogue’ with this person is beneficial for Hindus.
What’s this all about? Would it reduce the unemployment rate, or end wars? No, say scientists, but it would help explain why we, and the rest of the universe, exist. It would explain why the matter created in the Big Bang has mass, and is able to coalesce. Without it, as CERN explained in a background paper, “the universe would be a very different place…. no ordinary matter as we know it, no chemistry, no biology, and no people.”
If i ran out of spare time, (which is most probably what it's gonna be during May),
I can remember one Christmas when I said, "Santa MUST be real, because my parents would never get me a TV for my room!" And now I think that is sad. Because my parents DID buy me a TV for my room. And I didn't get to thank them for it. Instead, I thanked a man who doesn't even exist. (Thanks now, Mom and Dad!)
Me – Hi??
Ok, so he lied, and, he talked privately about trying to make a deal for the senate seat. I am sad to say that it sounds like politics as usual to me.
The Center for Constitutional Rights (CCR) is collecting testimonies from New Yorkers who have been stopped by the NYPD. This collection of stories will appear in an upcoming report that documents the impact of stop-and-frisk on peoples’ lives, highlights data regularly provided by the NYPD (CCR receives this data regularly as part of our legal action against the NYPD) and discusses relevant human rights standards.
Xypherous: … is that really necessary?
I'm going to have the ol' homebrew flowing for a bachelor party next week. I'll have a Kölsch, an Imperial Stout and a Belgian on tap. The party will be for my buddy Alexander. I'm going to be best man at his wedding in April.
I have been oh so masculine in so many ways in my life, oh so tough. So in control. I’ve dismissed and diminished the soft feminine, the woman in me. Maybe it’s time for her to smile shyly and emerge from the shadows.
+ Allows you to covertly carry gear without screaming I have thousands of dollars of equipment in here!
she was and will forever be my first baby.
Water infrastructure challenges identified
Excel also has built in functions. These functions allow you to complete, sometimes complex, calculations quickly and relatively painlessly.
Humanity Healing Community acts as one of the new world’s wayshowers in suggesting that the arrival of the Lammas/New Moon/Fifth Day is even more potent because as a point in consciousness — it encourages us to choose actively how we want our new world to be.
The lane ran alongside the lough and eventually I came to the point where it ended. Lough Graney (Greine in Gaelic) is the largest lake in Co Clare and yet in all the time we were there I only saw two mallard and a heron on it. I found it a rather forbidding and unfriendly stretch of water though apparently it's a wonderful place if you're a keen angler.
What about the man who was lowered on a bed into a crowded house? It was obvious he needed to be able to walk again but Jesus saw deeper than that. What he needed was forgiveness of sins, a way out of the mess his life was in: “Son, your sins are forgiven.” So when he took up his bed and walked, the healed man walked with his head held high into a new story full of possibilities.
The Crest hotel Slyvania is the hidden gem of the Shire! With a great atmosphere, arcade game, Bangin Dj’s and a dance floor that goes off…..why wouldn’t you be there on a Friday night? So come on give the Crest a red hot go!
Welcoming as the place is, you will still be faced with closed doors on Tuesdays and Wednesdays, and with limited opening hours on Mondays outside the summer season. You can get there by train or by De Lijn, but the train is faster. From Brussel there are direct trains to Liedekerke. From there it is a 20 minute walk along the seemingly never-ending Stationstraat. Iddergem station (make sure not to confuse it with Idegem station on the same line; believe me, the only facility there while waiting for the train back is a frituur café) is closer, but you will have to change trains at Denderleeuw. The next big railway project may well bring it even closer. Inspired by the Parisian RER, the GEN - a regional express network around Brussels - is being built. My hope is that whilst bringing beer tourists easier to Liedekerke and around in Payottenland, the network does not challenge this unique part of Vlaanderen with its rich beer culture.
If you donate $3 or whatever you can today, you'll be doing your part to support the campaign, and be automatically entered to join them in Los Angeles.
Recorded during a concert in the Melkweg, Amsterdam on March 20, 1987, by Joris Oldewelt. This same concert was recorded for release on lp (Milady Music 10023, also released on cd). I refer you to my earlier post for an explanation of this song (and a video). I love Zani's dynamics in this version, with some lovely restrained, almost tiptoeing guitar. Flani's singing is really superb in this song, full of genuine emotion when citing the names of the greats that have passed away...
Sometimes our tour card lies. This week's card directed us to the Firestation and promised us a "Fire and Police Store." We were so pumped about the store and were sad to find the Nolita location no longer exists. There is one in the Village, so we may head there for all our FDNY t-shirt and mug needs on a later walk.
all that I have to give.
03 Enter a New Phase
Nothing could bring him, when his lady died,
He was 27 years old, born with no arms and legs, and he was very handsome.
Thu 11/13 Chicago, IL Riviera Theatre
focused on one section
All the power comes on again.
A final hypocrisy to the Nth Degree was the ( so called ) Bank Bailout. If you owned a business, and you screw around and scam etc, would the Feds bail you out? No, as your place was sinking into bankruptcy, the sharks would encircle. Finally, you would take the best offer ( if any at all ) with ‘ hat in hand ‘ and go home. ‘ Oh ‘ , they tell you, ‘ But a crisis like the banking one would tear down our whole economic system…. We had to save them, to save America! ‘ Hogwash! Uncle Sam should have simply sat down with those failing con men and play ‘ Let’s make a deal ‘ . Assets would have been sold at fire sale prices with the government taking receivership of those institutions. Instead of an 800 billion dollar bailout, this approach would have been much more frugal and effective. Then, when the time was ripe, the Feds could have sold those companies to the highest bidder. Just as with claiming racehorses, there would have been a shake to see who got the deal….. That is how many bidders there would have been.
What does it mean to do wrong, when no one punishes you? A smart and unflinching look at friendship, the nature of entitlement, and growing up in the heartland.
Since our couple hate each other and are sick of spending so much time together, Eun Jae devices a plan to end their relationship. How about she gets injured while saving his life so that she’ll be admitted to the hospital forcing him to get a new bodyguard? So they go to some abandoned building in her hometown where she’d hit him with a baseball bat and then somehow get herself hurt. The moment she bashes him in the back, some dude sees the door open and locks them in. Then slapstick jokes you can see coming from a mile away start to happen. Like they can’t get cellphone reception anywhere but outside the window so she climbs on him and stretches her hand outside and of course she drops her phone. And then he suggests that she try to climb out of the window and she gets stuck. I’m so shaking my head at the things one has to do for an acting role these days.
So. Monday. Monday was the normal Monday. I am odd in the fact I don’t find Monday’s to be Evil in the slightest. I like them. Start of a new week, waiting to see what Evil exploits will unfold.
The dealer from Omaha actually brought it to our house for us to test drive and
AFRICA: Huge coal deposits and two massive gas fields in Mozambique are indicative of changing scenarios and fortunes in Africa where there are 6 of the world’s 10 fastest growing economies in the past decade. The World Bank predicts economic growth of 5.3%. Africa still has many of the the world’s poorest countries but there are huge infrastructure projects, an expanding middle class and foreign equity scrambling for opportunities in telecom’s, financial services and products. As previously mentioned in an earlier blog, the Chinese have a strong presence (and an unfortunate hunger for ivory). Can we hope for an equitable distribution of wealth or will the “resource curse” (and tribal and “big man” politics) again leave most people worse off than ever.
You see, lately I've been feeling a little overwhelmed, over taxed, and over scheduled. I need to get off the gerbil wheel, and make sure that I take some time to stop and really LIVE.
As soon as I dropped the straitjacket of the thriller template, suddenly the new book that I’m working on started to flow. Of course there will be suspense, and lots of it too. But if women’s fiction means writing about real life, that’s what I’ll stick to. And when my new book comes out, this time I’ll make sure it’s called a ‘suspense novel.’
However we follow the printed directions of sex
But the incidence of cancers of the tonsil and base of the tongue have been going up over the past decades, he said. And those are the ones that are more likely to test positive for HPV. Read more>>
Me: Ethan. You need to tell me the truth. Did you pee in this?
Le Palais Royal never seems to be crowded... We left the bustling, buzzing rue du Faubourg St Honore
My ultimate favourite. The colouring of their wings are amazing. Their faces are so altered and different. I just adulation them. By far prettiest owl.
What we are seeing now in the media is mainly smoke and mirrors, with fragments of truth seeping through – so minuscule that the majority are not paying any attention to it. Gaddafi is either dead or retired, but for the sake of keeping the peace and facilitating the agenda of a New World Order, it is best that the Libyan rebels (mainly criminals and terrorists) believe they killed him. It was also the only way to put a stop to the civil war in Libya.
1 commingled
Me: Then that's some produce.
So, here goes nothing.
The win against Samford was a decent (not great) defensive performance. The Citadel has proven to be a tough matchup on the hardwood for the Birmingham Bulldogs over the years, and Saturday night was no exception. Samford shoots a lot of threes by design, but you have to make a decent percentage of them for that strategy to work, and Samford was only 7-29. Some of that was good defense by The Citadel, and some of it was just really bad shooting.
And welcome to my world!
Heat the remaining 3 tablespoons of oil in a large nonstick skillet. Add the burgers; cook over medium-low heat until crisp and browned, turning gently with a spatula 8 to 10 minutes per side. Transfer to a paper towel or brown paper bag lined plate to drain.
Receptions
By the time the Republican-led House returns next week, members will have been working in Washington on just 41 of the first 127 days of 2012 — and that was the busy part of the year. They are planning to be on vacation — er, doing “constituent work” — 17 of the year’s remaining 34 weeks, and even when they are in town the typical workweek is three days.
Except here’s the thing: it does apply, especially in bouldering competitions. Kids, and I do mean kids–Miramont places special emphasis on their variety of youth climbing programs–need to understand what they can do, what they can’t do, and what might lie in between…but they need a clear understanding of that, or at least clearer than, “I dunno, you’re in between everything!”. Which is what, it seems, to me at least, this system promotes. My climbing partner, while discussing it post-gym session, was equally baffled. (Actually, probably not…he’s a much more strategic thinker than I. But it didn’t make sense to him either, and that made me feel a little better about the whole thing.)
10/26 – Carrboro, NC – Cat’s Cradle
For Professional Classes, Training, Events & Retreats by Robin Duncan based on the principles of A Course in Miracles Go to: MiracleCenterofCa.com
Oh, and these awesome women, in the most SENSATIONAL coloured saris and bindis kept blessing us and handing us lollies and cans of warm soft drink.
Diamond: $999.
The best part of this hotel is the staff. Everyone is so nice and caring. Evan was well known in the different areas in the hotel and that made a huge difference. Especially that one time when he fled out the door and into the elevator. I went down to the lobby and I was happy to find him with three of the guards waiting for me. On several occasions he fell asleep in the taxi and they helped me carry him into the room as I had my hands full with Joshua.
He tells Nicodemus that he needs a NEW LIFE!
"Come here." With great difficulty, the old man knelt down on the floor and lovingly pulled Monsieur Dupree close to him. He tied a ribbon around his neck with a huge red bow, and then he attached a note to it. Monsieur DuPree wondered what it said.
Long before the Governator took over and somehow left for broke my state, there was the T2: Judgement Day. I don’t care who you are, if you’ve seen this movie you have never said this movie was not good, although it may not be as high on your list. In fact, it stuck with me so much that three days ago as I watched Safe House, I saw Robert Patrick, who had a major role in T2 and acknowledged to myself that no matter what he did he would always be the T1000 to me. The Universal Studios 3D attraction should also not be missed. James Cameron is a perfectionist and I have a lot of respect for what he does. I watched this movie daily. Despite not liking this films version of John Connor.
Parent advice – The App includes a page of information about the App and includes a link to a page on their website with many more resources for parents.
Even though this is an All-Star subset card, it does have Stan's 1957 stats on it so I think this counts. Damn, he torched the Giants that year. This is not a terribly rare card, high numbers from 1958 are not hard to find. Also, this card is actually triple printed. Stan and Mickey Mantle both were triple printed in the high number series in '58 which might be why it sold so well. You can get your own Stan Musial "First Topps Card" for not all that much scratch if you really want one. This one set me back a fiver.
2- Deschutes Oak Aged Jubel 2000
God will make happen for you what you make happen for
Confess Your Mess Contest
If you have not yet checked out the web site for the CNIE-RCIÉ conference (May 14-16 in Canmore, AB), please do so today as well as start thinking about your possible submission. Both the proposal call and the submission mechanism for proposals are present and operational on the web site.
"It seems the Kalas were either forgotten or no one made the connection. The run down south was quicker but not as profitable as the longer route to Japan. On the other hand, for the first time in decades they got news about the new world and what was going on. It soon became clear to Marko that English and French settlements had potential. The question was how best to reach and exploit those colonies. Going all the way South and back north seemed risky."
accounts in Omega Securities, abetted Soh in using a scheme to defraud
If someone set a box of crayons in front of you, what color would you gravitate towards? Is your decision based on a like for that particular color or it is based on your mood at the time? Just Curious!
I know how much you love me, in just one look
In the name of Jesus,
SMALL STRAWS IN A SOFT WIND by MARSHA BURNS:
City Island is also a nice place to go just to walk around. Tom and I would take Poochie, and then Benny, to the Island. We would park the car at one end and walk on City Island Avenue down to the water's end and back.
The first place I really began to notice this was in movie theaters, first as VCR’s and then DVD players became widely available people seem to have lost the ability to differentiate between when they are at home and when they are in public. At home they talk through the movies, make jokes and that’s fine, they are not disturbing anyone but their own family. However in a theater they are now disrupting other people’s experience and this is completely inconsiderate.
CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION (CDC). Outbreak of influenza A in a nursing home – New York, Dec. 1991 - Jan. 1992. Morb Mortal Wkly Rep MMWR 1992; 18: 129-131.
We started with a combo of 4 salads :
Exodus 34:13-17 But ye shall destroy their altars, break their images, and cut down their groves: For thou shalt worship no other god: for the LORD, whose name is Jealous, is a jealous God: Lest thou make a covenant with the inhabitants of the land, and they go a whoring after their gods, and do sacrifice unto their gods, and one call thee, and thou eat of his sacrifice; And thou take of their daughters unto thy sons, and their daughters go a whoring after their gods, and make thy sons go a whoring after their gods. Thou shalt make thee no molten gods.
a transparent glitter-filled superball.
KG Who (or what) has influenced you as an artist?
”The Syrian Arab Republic is ready to continue cooperation with Mr. Annan to implement his plan and will inform him of the undertaken steps in the hope of obtaining the aforementioned guarantees, ” the statement concluded.
You are a humble man of a passing night
All are fed and loved and set free…
One guy from my shift looks over at me and whispers “You know Sgt. so and so thinks you tipped them off.” I don’t know why but this pissed me off. Rumors don’t normally bother me but this questions my integrity. This officer calms me down and tells me that we all know we were not informed of this so don’t let it bother me. I realized he was right and that Sgt was probably just trying to piss me off.
I *bleep* the spiders on the wall
10 Panic In Detroit
here and post it in a comment. The contest will start tonight
Add the salt, maple syrup, blueberry powder, oat flour, and oats to the sponger, and attach dough hooks to your mixer and mix at low speed for a few minutes until thoroughly combined. (This can also be done by hand.)
September
All elements of the Olympics were present: eager competitors from all over the world, narrow (and at times controversial) final decisions, highly competitive contestants – and above all bronze, silver and gold medals.
Smoked Duck + Mushrooms + Tomme Crepe
And the violent shades exchanges
Soon I hear a man’s voice on the other side of the boat. A guy in a motorboat had pulled up to try to help us out. He said he couldn’t get out of the boat because he didn’t have an anchor, or he would leave his boat and help.
On that note, we’re heading to our favorite train station to sing for a little while and time is money so….
Also notable on the trip was the lack of bars across the chair lifts.
4 T butter, slightly softened
Mom: I love you most. I wish you could stay little forever.......
W1: Oh, I'm sorry. Well, maybe you'll meet someone interesting in the grocery store sometime and you'll end up having them over for dinner.
On days such as this one, it's easier to sense the goodness life has wrought. The sun is shining bright in a cloudless blue sky, a slight breeze comes up every few minutes and rustles the leaves on the trees. Three goldfinches share the bird feeder with a pair of red-winged blackbirds, the deep pink blossoms of a crab apple tree as their backdrop. The shadows created by the tree limbs, outlined on the grass below, feel peaceful and right.
I'm not alone...
Beat with hand mixer until spreading consistency. Spread over warm cake.
Your first 20 note cards and a complete Works Consulted list (minimum: 10 sources) are due TONIGHT by midnight. Check yesterday’s post for materials related to the research project.
Rnd 3) ch1, 2hdc in first st, hdc in next st, * 2hdc in next st, hdc in next st repeat from * around
About an hour later…
And deep in the rift of the Caradoc drift
* Multiply the number of years your Nephilim was incarnated by 2 to determine how many occult development points you have to spend on occult skills. Distribute occult development points among available techniques, spells, occult Lores or a specific Arcanum Lore, up to 50 points per technique in this past life, and to a maximum of 90 points per technique.
It was nice to spend a Sunday at home at once, most of our Sundays are spent at Daniel’s dad’s and I miss staying home sometimes. Shaun’s favorite teams is the Dolphins so we tried cheering them on against the Steelers, but sadly the Steelers won. Then we watched my Ravens kick some Raiders butt and make their way to the play offs as a Wild Card team.
O LORD, our Lord,
The sentiments are in Romanian and mean: "Congratulations" and "Your baby boy was born; Be ready for a love greater than life!"
Little miss A had a lot of fun trick-or-treating this year and made out like a bandit with all her candy! It took her a few tries to get the hang of taking candy (she originally tried to give some to the homeowners) but in the end she was a pro! Everyone loved her costume (and daddy's too). Sadly though, some people didn't even know who they were. I felt very old at that point haha! Her buddy Jack was supposed to be Bam-Bam but it didn't work out this year. Maybe next year they'll be a different dynamic duo. Any suggestions?! Hope everyone had a great time!
Speaking of desserts . . . I loved Sand and Sisal's brownie pops--in the shape and decor of an Easter egg! They are just as easy to make as a cake pop and make a darling presentation.
I have also joined a site called Let's Scrap more specifically I have joined their groups...100 layouts in 2012. Yes I am going to try and do 100 layouts this year. I also love their group - Organise your Stash and Scrap your Stash. I am a hoarder of not in my studio and I am a procrastinator too.... No more. :D
At this rate, though, he will end up with someone else and I will feel wounded. While I may be future telling, creating a negative thought I should challenge, it's inevitable. When I don't give him what he wants, he finds it elsewhere.
I will exercise daily to keep fit.
Nazi-like, the Turks appropriated everything the Armenians owned, a sum probably amounting to well over billion dollars in today's money. Because they had confiscated all records relating to investments, deeds, bank accounts and insurance policies, the Turkish government even had the raw nerve to approach U.S. Ambassador Henry Morganthau with the request that all insurance claims due on life insurance policies owed to the Armenians by American companies be paid directly to the Turkish government 'until the missing policy holders can be located.'
Pappa did not like the way most of his neighbors (and his own grandchildren) were forgetting this old custom. To him, we were adopting the ways of Les Americans (what he called English speakers, a term almost as insulting as Yankees). You see, we were getting presents on Christmas – and to the older folks that practice was sacrilegious on one of the two most holy days of the year.
Help! Which Type of Material Should I Choose For My Earrings?
I have a couple of small little updates to share this week for Metamorphosis Monday. I decided to remove the TV from the office since I found I only turned it on a couple of times a month. You can see it in this older photo to the right of the wallpaper organizer, beside the lamp. I guess I hadn't added the ottoman yet when this pic was taken.
BTW, Sinbad is a riot in “Jingle” check out this “Buster-Approved” Scene:
The following appeal comes from a Swedish blogger who circumvents the MSM’s disinformation network and their calculated omissions of news items, by alerting the general public in matters concerning the troubling ”immigrant question” in today’s Sweden.
min 33:32
Swift Grey Steed – 500 gold + 5 Champion’s Seals
But you didn't really try
With flitting butterfly,
in more important news... the winner of the marc jacobs ring is Sabrina yeeyy congrats!! thank you to everyone who took part! your comments and ideas have been lovely to read! I assure you there will be more giveaways coming up soon..
The moment God saves the believing sinner, at that very moment, that one, becomes a saint and a member of the Church, Which is the Body of Christ. (Ephesians 1:23, Ephesians 4:4-5, Colossians 1:25-26). In 2 Cor. 1:21-22 we read that God establishes the believer and anoints the believer, “God, Who hath also sealed us, and given the earnest of the Spirit in our hearts.” In Ephesians 4:9-13 we learn how God is building up the Body of Christ, “For the building up of the Body of Christ, Till we all come in the unity (oneness) of The Faith, unto a perfect man.”
Me: "I think YOU are the only accountant I know that's an exception to the stereotype. I went out with an accountant once."
The Rockville Senior Center and the City of Rockville will host beginning and intermediate Facebook workshops next month.
He is sweet with everyone. He is housebroken. He is overweight. He snores.
Am I not the most disgusting, immoral thing you’ve ever heard of? Well, guess what: As of January, 2010, I’m a legal Person in the United States, and I’m allowed to buy off your politicians and tell you nothing. What do you think of me now…….? That’s what I thought.
But all this was of local importance. Ralph Allen had very limited success marketing his stone further afield and so his influence did not extend beyond his own city.
On the day that was supposed to be our first day of vacation, Ocean City was under a mandatory evacuation. We had no idea what was going to happen. There was a chance we wouldn't get to go on a vacation at all. But, instead of moping around about it, we decided to enjoy the day by going to one of our favorite places - Ohiopyle. It WAS on our "Summer To Do List" after all! (We crossed off 9 of the 12 items. The list was "Learn to Swim (sort of), Go to the Science Center, Ride the Alpine Slide at Seven Springs, Go Letterboxing, Go to "Castle Park", Go to Idlewild, Go to Ohiopyle, and Go to the beach!)
Vidocq le rencontra priant dans une église,
Here's a shot from the side:
One of the central theme’s running through the history is failure. Of planes, men and companies. The industry goes the way of auto manufacturers. Consolidation without government money priming the pumps.
Lately, it caught the attention of someone very handsome and popular himself - Nate Berkus. Yes, Meg has recently been a guest on the Nate Berkus show talking about her part time escapades as a Junk Whisperer! The producers and Nate were so happy with her first appearance, more are in the works! Pretty impressive, no?
Judy Garland called Joe Bushkin, “a musician’s musician,” Frank Sinatra said, “One of the things I missed most about leaving Tommy Dorsey’s band was the piano playing of Joe Bushkin.” Over the course of his illustrious 70 year career, Joe Bushkin played with Benny Goodman, Louis Armstrong, Artie Shaw, Billie Holiday, led the band for Sinatra at the paramount and was Bing Crosby’s musical director.
Hairdo How-to:
They traffic in sheep and use them for the personal gain
When this takes place, you will know arrests have taken place. We cannot
Elizabeth Hand – The Bacchae
Steven Weston was getting £197 every two weeks in handouts including a disability allowance for his "chemical addiction" or drug dependency. Yes. You read that right. This emotive 'benefit cut' is going to include...drug addicts. And you thought it was just the blind, the halt, the lame, didn't you?
If I was to use the entire board and fill every day, I would also lighten up the photos so they are nearly hints of photos rather than full live living color. Then you could write over them and actually see what you are writing.
Heavens to Betsy!!! It has been FOREVER...almost a YEAR to be exact since I blogged. To be honest, I was burned out. I was tired of logging everything that I was doing in my life instead of just trying to LIVE those moments and soak them in....but I am ready to jump back in and I have LOTS to share! Some things have stayed the same...I am still a full time working mama trying to juggle it all, I still have the best and most amazing husband in the world but one huge blessing is that we have made and tightened our bond with some incredible people over the past year! Our family is so lucky to have such amazing support...
The colonial possessions that were white were under the sovereign – i.e. under the authority of the British government. Such nations as the Union of South Africa, Australia, New Zealand and Canada were governed under British law. These only represented thirteen percent of the people who made up the inhabitants of the Britsh Empire.
On a serious note however, due to lack of education in many instances, and a failing medical system on the other, many Ghanaians (and other West Africans) attribute undiagnosed illnesses to the spiritual world. It is common to hear that someone is under spiritual attack. January 2011, Ghana reported that a well known Nigerian actress is suffering in this way.
See Huw, she'll kill me!!
subject: RE: Hello!
prime the MDF board in your basement next to your elliptical trainer
Another day to spend, un-wasted, to cherish.
For the filling: While the crust cools, in a medium bowl, stir the cream cheese, lime zest and salt with a rubber spatula until softened, creamy and thoroughly combined. Add the sweetened condensed milk and whisk vigorously until fully incorporated and no lumps of cream cheese remain. Whisk in the egg yolk. Add the lime juice and whisk gently until it is incorporated (mixture will thicken slightly)
One day the universe hands you a new life and says, Hey! You! Here’s your new life! Yay! And regardless of what you think of it, or what your capabilities are, there you are with with your shiny new life and not a clue what to do with it. Sound familiar to anyone else? In my case it’s mental illness. After three years of sobriety I was shot into another dimension by an episode of panic disorder which quickly escalated into other things. Looking back on that experience, I can only say an instruction manual would have been nice.
Who knows... Perhaps, we can make the world a better place, one sex act at a time.
The afternoon we finally made it down to the beach... wearing the most perfect stylestaker blouse, a big kudos to them for providing me with the ideal holiday wardrobe and eased my packing by 100 %. Flowy sheer pieces that take up to no room, but look oh so good on.
This weeks menu is not that fun, but it works.
Drum Solo
Through my work with the dying, I was gradually transformed into a student of life, which ultimately led me to write my book, What Really Matters: 7 Lessons for Living from the Stories of the Dying. It is both a call to awaken to the spiritual aspect of this life on earth and a guidebook for navigating tragedy.
Your website content must also be interesting enough to keep your visitors from coming back to your page. Some website bore their visitors to death; they will never come back to your site again.
The Islamic tradition already sanctifies the taking of captives for ransom and to terrorize enemies, and they now have the example of Israel, one of the few states with a reputation for standing up to terrorists now caving in and swapping live terrorists for corpses after Hezbollah bluntly refused to abide by any of what we would refer to as civilized norms by allowing a sign of life from the captives.
Have you hired an “overqualified” candidate? Tell us about your experience.
Angelica is a Mom, business woman, friend, basically a juggler of many things. I hope and wish today on her birthday she gets treated like a Queen and takes a break, she surely deserves it. Angelica you are a wonderful human being and truly deserve the best. Sending you many hugs and birthday wishes on your birthday.
She is part of "America's uninsured" that everyone talks about, but if you have insurance you really don't give it much thought. I have been thinking about that, and her, all day.
U. G. Krishnamurti is an original voice in which much of contemporary spirituality is understood in a new way. For those interested in the full spectrum of modern spiritual thought, this is a “must read.” In the well-known history of J. Krishnamurti, few names have been so strongly associated with his message as U. G. Krishnamurti, who shared a close but contentious relationship with him over many years. U.G. was raised to take on the mantle of guru, much like J. Krishnamurti. When the two men eventually met, each had rejected the guru role, and for years they conversed regularly, struggling to uncover the nature of truth, before a falling out led each in a different direction.
Sept 13 – Musica – Akron, OH (W/Valencia)
Like Jacob’s dream, not all doors are physical. My own “doorway” was the first time I heard Rachmaninov’s Vespers. It was being played on the radio – and I heard it by chance. Both my wife and myself were utterly struck by the music. We listened carefully until it ended, wanting above all to find out what music this was. It was like nothing I had heard before – and opened the door to a deep longing that years later found its fulfillment in the Orthodox Church.
She adjusted the lights and the microphone. She seemed to make the stage inviting again.
Our icky fingerbowl sherbet with a squeezed out lemon and bits of food floating around is ready!
This is where I am at this morning... I want these children to never leave our home. Ever. I have cried so many tears in the last 2 days at the mere thought of it. Our home has been a revolving door for the broken, the wanderer and the fatherless for the last 13 years of our marriage. I get ZERO credit for this. In fact I have fought God almost every time He brings new people and every time He takes them out. You see, I want stability in my circumstances. He wants stability in my soul. I want happiness, He wants me to have deep, everlasting JOY! In my pride I want people to look at our life and see order, He wants people to look at our life and see that He is the order in our chaos. I want people to see I have it all together, He wants people to see that I will be a fool for Christ!
I am continually filled with gratitude for the clarity to have seen that we were on the wrong path and that we needed to get out of there quickly and without wasting one more second.
i just realized that today is my blog's birthday.
So I tried my first Saison not long ago and was interested in trying another! I found this 22 oz bottle of Helios from Victory Brewing in PA at the quite reasonable price of $2.99. The label was so friendly and welcoming - a smiling sun in a glass! Delightful! As I opened it there was a loud PFFFFFT and the lovely smell filled the room and carbonation filled the glass as I poured. The head was massive and fluffy. It lasted forever and left puffs of lace all over the glass. The liquid was cloudy yellow with small yeast sediments. And the smell! I don't think I have the strongest sense of smell. But oh man...There were some powerful esters going in this guy! Spicy pepper, Belgian yeast, grassy hops, mildly sweet malts, lemon...Delightful!And Helios was very tasty as well! Belgian yeast, some spice, lemon, a bit of grass. Kind of reminded me of a white wine at times. Dry -- leaves you wanting more! And more! As it warmed the spices and sour flavor stood out to me more. Even at 7.5% alcohol, I did not detect it in the taste.
Inclined to keep his head down,
The late Eric Morecambe would’ve said at this point, “Whaddya think of it so far?”
Student : What about darkness, Professor? Is there such a thing as darkness?
~ The Phoenix on the Sword (1932)
Shot under the incensed eyes, and from the bow furious with anger,
even I counted myself a weeper on the shore
He coaxed out his little girl.
I still use my daisy dishware every day. Not only is it lovely, the set is a reminder of everything that I have gone through to get where I am. An actual physical token of my journey from Japan, to Canada, and back to Florida. I love dining on memories.
And faintly strove that weary one
need do is think and talk the Word. Keep talking and calling real what God has
As far as school goes he came home the first few days really not liking it. I think he has adjusted now but it was tough for a while. I have had several conversations with his teacher about focus and organization so we are working on that too.
Lyle followed her to the club. He spots Julie, Cliff and Peggy and joins them. Back home Julie can’t hold back,. She tells Lyle she knows he killed Bob. She tries various things to get him out of the house so she can pack and leave. Lyle is suspicious and takes the distributor cap out of the car.
From time to time I hope to bring you another addition to what I'm going to call my Gallery of Small "Saints".
Suddenly, her forward progress continued only from the knees up as her foot caught the leg of the chair that had just slid back from someone oblivious to her approaching. She tried desperately to free herself from the chair while at the same time maintaining the balance on food and coffee in her hands, unfortunately something had to give as the inertia on the plate of food won the battle, the food became a flying missile headed for the back of a man’s head who was just about to sample his blueberry pancakes!
* What I love about your work is that you’re not afraid to make brave choices. A powerful theme runs through both books – how far to take duty and sacrifice. How far can one person go? Devil’s Kiss had some fraught, highly-charged moments and the ending required Billi to make a decision about Kay that no one should ever have to make. In DARK GODDESS she faces a similar dilemma with Vasilisa. How far were you able to go in writing the book, or did you have to rein yourself in with regards to some of the choices you made? As a YA writer how far do you think it’s possible to push these boundaries, to really ask the question, what would anyone do in this situation?
1/2 cup cream or half-and-half
Raising taxes strangles an economy. Lowering taxes, up to a certain point stimulates it because when people have more of their own money, they spend or invest it, since there's nothing else one can do with money aside from burning it in the fireplace or burying it in the back yard....and spending it on goods and services or investing it generates more tax revenues.
Pictued: London (4 months), Grandma and Grandpa Luke, Maw-Maw and Paw-Paw Vliet
The contents of those cake boxes were almost always the same- typically an assortment of 10 slices of sponge cakes frosted with delicious butter cream. Some would be crusted with chocolate rice, others would be dotted with colourful jams. Quite often, the ones with chocolate would get snapped up first after which we would reach for those topped with jams... The tradition has become simplified over the years. Nobody runs around distributing cakes on their engagement day anymore. Instead these have been replaced by cake vouchers which one can redeem from the bakery stores.
the Mehrangarh Fort
Acts 22:6
They could have caught him making a less odd face.
心灵的感悟，将会
This little yellow bird. I have finished making the blocks for Sonny's quilt and so now I need to start thinking about the backing and the binding. I never worry about these things until I'm well on the way with the quilt top as it usually comes to me as the top is coming together.
I thought about just darting out and running into the main hallway. I could run faster than most of the engineers out there, and it was sure to get distracted by the easier meat (and bigger brains), but that left me with the problem of pulling up my pants and washing my hands. I couldn't leave the bathroom without washing my hands. I was raised better than that.
07 In The Pines 05:23
Happy Invincible Summer release day! I hope it's as spectacular for you as a Tuesday can be.
Tie a little bow at the top of the handle or at the bottom.
The Disability Rights Education and Defense Fund (DREDF) is unveiling a short web survey, Public Transit Choices By People With Disabilities, as part of our transportation research on the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA). We hope many people in the disability community across the country will participate in the survey, which can also be found at:
Candidates can learn more about the terms and conditions of the prize at:
I have a couple of basses that have frets – so called “precision” basses, in the nomenclature of Leo Fender. By “precision”, Leo meant that any old bass player could pick up one of these instruments and play in tune. And so you can, but you lose so many of the subtle glides and tonal variations of a stand up, acoustic bass. A fretless bass is really the only thing to have, if you want to play bass lines of beauty.
Well, that's it! We aren't doing much more for St. Patty's Day, other than having Lucky Charms for breakfast tomorrow! And maybe a leprechaun will mess up their room... ;-)
-I usually like to oil the muffin tins lightly and bake the muffins directly inside the tins but it's easier to bake them and giveaway as gifts if they are baked in muffin paper cups. I find they dry out at the bottom more if baked in paper cups so I placed the muffin tray on a large cookie sheet to see if the paper cup muffins will bake better that way. The cookie sheet at the bottom also helps with catching overflowing dough as it rises. This method helped with keeping the muffin bottom more moist.
I got a little behind on scrapbooking this past week, but yesterday I was able to finish the layout I'd started for Sketch #9 of Kelly Purkey's Sketchbook 4 class. I also made a card for Austin for his birthday (coming up in a week & a half) using this sketch last night.
I was composing a mail on GMail. Yeah had “is attached” in the message. On clicking the send button…got this pop up!! I did send the mail but got me thinking… Hey are my mails being censored in some way?! Analysed, read?! This certainly piqued the paranoia in me!!
to keep practicing using that voice
Finally, as wind power transmission and storage technology improves some of the plants might become uneconomic and get shut down earlier than they would have before. True costs make this timing rational and economic.
I'm off to Toronto for work this week and I'll spend the weekend in Ottawa visiting a friend and her new baby girl. Adam tells me he'll have the basement painted by the time I get home, which I couldn't be more excited about. Every other project in our house is on hold until the basement is finished, so I can't wait for the painting to be done! As a reminder, our basement basically looks like this:
” We care about Peace because we value Life.”
had used just minutes before. Again, Riley slinked into the kitchen; crawling to the same spot
I can’t say that the therapy was effective! It has left deep emotional wounds that never seem to heal. It has also resulted in difficulties in decision making, difficulty in concentrating and lacking in confidence and selfesteem. It also influenced my interest in sex, it has led me to live completely celibate, something I on the other hand have done my entire life! I didn’t even have the chance to live a “sinful life”. Celibacy, however, has been used for ages by religious groups for people who for various reasons want to suppress sexual urges in their lives. Nuns and monks, just to mention a few in history.
So if you would like to win this souvenir, all you need do is leave a comment on this post. If you put the button on your sidebar, or mention it on your blog/twitter/facebook, then let me know and I'll enter you a second time. I am prepared to send to anywhere on the globe and will leave the giveaway open until midnight GMT on Saturday 12th May. A winner will be announced on the Monday. Good luck!
It means onto the Viking and making my deadline.
January 1995; with Vimochana, India
I have been very busy the last few days so have not had time to continue on my mission to get my house organised once again. I have been doing little bits and pieces. Like unpacking our luggage from our vacation two weeks ago, that were still sitting on the floor in our rooms. But I wanted to check in and do a post as I am really enjoying my new life as a blogger.
I think in some ways mothers are scared. I know I am time to time. Scared of being judged. Scared that I am not doing everything I should, or could be doing for my children, and myself too. Scared that my children will be pissed off at me when they are older and angry at all the things I did or didn't do.
All New York City children who turn four years of age by December 31, 2011 are eligible for free UPK seats. Available half-day and full day UPK seats are located at public schools and community-based childcare centers contracted by the Department of Education. UPK offers flexibility in that families can enroll their children in available seats located where they live, where they work, where they go to school or wherever it is convenient for them.
Wait no Faction Ships? Nope! No Billion ISK T3 Ships, Nope. I live in Empire, I’m relatively poor. I can’t afford such luxury ships. Plus what the hell am I gonna do with such ships anyway, I don’t do Missions much and don’t do Incursions or non of that stuff. Your thinking of that other guy that like shiny ships.
Exactly..another bogus stimulus, with the idea that those Evil Tea Party Republicans are choosing tax breaks for billionaires and those horrible oil companies over jobs for America's unemployed.
Thereon they parted for that time.
So I got a little surprise today from Sigma. It turns out he will be he for a shorter time than I had originally thought. In May he is heading out across the country to see his family. They moved off the island about a year or so ago. He's staying out there for at least a month. Then when he comes back, he goes to Pennsylvania for another month to see his mother side of the family and stay with them for another moth or so. After that, he pretty much stay on the island for one more week then gets shipped off for his training at which point I'll pretty much rarely see him until fleet week rolls into the city.
- 2 extra soft newborn teats
In Game 2 of the Celtics/Hawks series on Tuesday, Pierce was able to step up to clinch the victory (87-80). If you’re not aware or haven’t heard, Rajon Rondo was suspended for Game 2 for bumping the referee in Game 1. It was said through the league that the ref didn’t really care for Rondo and the call was out of animosity. Pierce led his team in points and rebounds, 36 pts. and 14 rebounds respectively. The Celtics will have both home advantage and Rondo in Game 3 on Friday (7:30 pm on ESPN).
What to do: Make tea as you normally would and drink it (or don't) as you are waiting for the tea bags to completely cool. Then lay down. (Yes, the world will not fall apart if you lay down for 15 minutes. Trust me.) Place cooled but still damp tea bags on your eyes. The natural tannins of the tea will decrease puffiness and brighten up your eye area leaving you feeling refreshed and slightly more awake after 15 minutes.
28. If me bin know always deh behind de door. We are quick to use ignorance as an excuse for our mistakes.
In haunted basements, safely kept,
I wanted the cake portion to be pink, so I made an ombre cake with varying shades of pink. Instead of making my go-to vanilla cake, I was inspired by this purple ombre cake at Raspberri Cupcakes and so I decided to try her recipe instead. Since her recipe was for five 8-inch layers, I divided the recipe by half to make four 6-inch layers.
So what has been going on in your life? I have been little-miss-never-posts, possibly because as I have previously mentioned, I kind of write the blog as a never ending catch up email to my mum. And since mum is here and fully caught up on everything that's going on, everyone else misses out! Sorry!
Shaun Maddox (English Democrats) 566 (9%)
In the states, the name O'Neill used to be known for the playwright Eugene and the politician Tip. Both are fading from collective memory.
· Small notebook for each child.
The Boers hope that private all white towns like Orania, or Kleinfontein, 30 km east of Pretoria, will serve as seed-crystals for a future homeland. Today, 300 residents live in Kleinfontein. Residents do all their own work, run their own schools, and take care of the old and the poor. Impressive, permanent homes spread across the grassy hills. But when asked how long it will take to grow into a homeland, town board member Jan Groenewald admits “not in my lifetime.”
1998 Gimme Five (5th), 2002 Spot Thedifference (UR 27th); 2003 Youlneverwalkalone (PU bef 13th); 2004 Clan Royal (2nd), Spot Thedifference (5th), Risk Accessor (UR 6th), Le Coudray (Fell 22nd); 2005 Innox (7th), Spot Thedifference (18th), Shamawan (21st), Clan Royal (CO 22nd), Le Coudray (PU before 21st), Risk Accessor (UR 2nd); 2006 Clan Royal (3rd), Risk Accessor (5th), Innox (Fell 1st), First Gold (UR 23rd); 2007 L’Ami (10th), Clan Royal (11th); 2008 King Johns Castle (2nd), L’Ami (Fell 2nd), Bob Hall (PU bef 19th), Butler’s Cabin (Fell 22nd); 2009 Butler’s Cabin (7th), Reveillez (BD 3rd), Can’t Buy Time (Fell 18th), L’Ami (PU bef 30th); 2010 DON’T PUSH IT (WON), Can’t Buy Time (Fell 8th), Arbor Supreme (UR 15th), King Johns Castle (refused to race); 2011 Don’t Push It (3rd), Blue Sea Cracker (14th), Quolibet (UR 11th), Can’t Buy Time (Fell 18th), Arbor Supreme (Fell 28th)
Whenever you bolt some air off of a admission or waterspout, icons will arise on the draft awning that you can tap to achieve your appearance achieve tricks. You abandoned accept four altered tricks to aces from, but you can alternation them calm to actualize altered combinations. Watching your penguin do handstands and backspins as a aftereffect of your borer is in actuality acceptable abnormally because lengthier combinations extend the continuance of the dispatch admission you get aloft landing. In the beginning, you’ll apparently feel like it’s a decay of time to accept to move your deride off of the buttons and assimilate the draft awning every time you appetite to achieve a trick. But afterwards a brace of races, you won’t even apprehension your deride aimlessly extensive for the draft awning afore you affix with ramps and waterspouts.
My lovelies, thank you so much for your sweet comments on our birth story. It felt so wonderful to reminisce. Now I'd love to share a few photos of the rest of our hospital stay, if you'd like to see...(This photo above is one of my all-time faves!)
Good Evening.
Kerry :-) xxx
Shot by Russell James, the ‘We Found Love’ singer poses nude on the magazine’s November issue cover, while sporting some mud on her body and drenched hair.
for more people who desire it.
As a child I took piano, voice, and trumpet lessons as well as sang in the children’s and adult choirs of my parish. There had always been the love of music in my life and one day in my sophomore year of high school my mother asked me if I would like to take organ lessons from the organist at our church. I figured that the organ was this beastly instrument that was really loud, so why not? Obviously I had no idea what I was getting myself into. Thanks Mom.
A friend provided the following interesting facts:
"Of course not! I'd have to buy her a drink or two before getting intimate."
And started jogging across to the other side.
Let me make one thing clear before going on:
In terms of cryptozoological significance, rediscovering 'The Forest Devil' hardly compares, for instance, with my recent solving of the long-baffling Trunko case, nor would it rank alongside the refinding of the legendary thunderbird photograph (should this ever happen one day), but, for me, it was just as eventful and satisfying. It also showed me that miracles, even if they are only very minor, personal ones, do indeed still happen in this mundane old world of ours. And that is something else well worth treasuring.
The Artist's Way by Julia Cameron
08 Like Someone in Love (Burke, Van Heusen) 04:54
Thanks as always for your thoughts and prayers.
and sparks wildly.
A slight quibble: it would be better to say she's a college senior UNLESS the fact she's attending that specific school is important. If it is important, say the whole name of the school: University of Maryland.
So much so, I think the sheer volume will be easy to miss. It is so incredibly easy to justify why it is ok to continue to do it the old way is to declare to yourself… “here” is as far as I go. To concede any part of your emerging, growing Self is to declare a resting spot within your life. You will have more opportunities to grow again.
As it happened, 40 men were asked to perform word gymnastics, in that they were given three words and required to provide a fourth word that would apply to the first three. For example: Tool, lunch and toy. The fourth word would be box.
I totally surprised Anthony and I liked it so much, I'm looking forward to trying other dutch babies. The only thing I'd add is a little dollop of whipped cream, that would've made it perfect.
“Anyone who doesn’t take it seriously and fools around will be sent to my office,” she declared sternly. “And get a big spanking from the headmistress,” she forgot to add.
It's going to be no prisoners in 2011.
Other: Twine and pearls from stash
All the menacing might of the globe uprisen around me,
Instead of just inhaling it, I made it.
I really began to read and collect YA fiction at university. Adolescence is one of the most intense periods in a person’s life, and all teenagers are in some sense borderliners. Full of energy, full of doubts; full of sound and fury. Questioning, searching, rejecting. In YA lit circles it’s customary to speak of a search for identity – for agency – and while I agree that this is, in our cultural context, an essential part of the teenage years, at least ideally, I don’t like to set an age limit. Rather, I see it as a lifelong process: we all bear the infant, the child, the teenager within us.
I am unmarried because I have yet to meet the right person. Well, maybe I've met her, but all the folderol surrounding dating is a barrier. Some people are ready, some people are not, and so the world turns.
On the other hand a basic income payment could be seen not so much as an additional tax burden, but as a resource with a large multiplier effect generating new life in the local economy. This would allow an entirely different picture of economic renewal to emerge with the potential for new tax generation. It must also be recognised that a basic income would significantly reduce the need for public and welfare spending, thereby liberating tax money. It is easy and cheap to administer because it does not require a means test; this would liberate further funds by the reduction of administration costs. Currently about 40 percent of the budget is spent on social services such as education, health, social security and housing. These allocations could be reduced significantly and allocated to basic income payments. This would leave a much greater responsibility in the hands of individuals to choose and pay for the social services they really desired.
In the casual comedy;
Pray for Silence- Linda Castillo
No wheat products.
Well I’m broken
Merci, Diam's.
You see, I'm a bit of a mint addict. Sure the lipbalm was shaped a little odd, but anything called Sweet Mint couldn't be that bad!
In the aftermath of UFC 145 we get to sit and digest the Jones versus Evans fight and figure out where both fighters go from here. For Dana White, there is no sitting and waiting. He announced after the event that Dan Henderson will be next in line to get a crack a Jones. Henderson has been patiently waiting for his next fight after defeating shogun Rua in a close fought battle.
This is my final sketch reveal for the Cardablities design team. I have had a fantastic time working with Karan's gorgeous sketches and am so grateful for the opportunity to do so.
After we checked into our hotel, I went for a little run to shake out my legs. Immediately upon exiting the air-conditioned lobby of the hotel, I finally had to acknowledge the reality that my body is the opposite of good at dissipating heat. It doesn't even try. It's like it doesn't care at all about my well-being and comfort. Less than a mile into my run, I was reduced to a shambling jog. Breathing was like trying to insufflate syrup through a coffee straw. It was at this point that I began to panic a little.
because I once made a joke about airport security doesn’t mean we want to run a blogpost on the evils of the TSA. The blog header says “Writing about writing. Mostly.” If you don’t have content for writers, you’re wasting your time.
Of course, there are some examples of people who regularly use large amounts of cannabis being repeatedly detained by the police under emergency detention and sometimes admitted to hospital, only to continue a revolving door approach when the effects wear-off and psychotic behaviour dissipates. The ‘interesting case’ I referred to at the top involved a family complaining at a police decision to implement detention under mental health law (s136) but the assessing professinoals were also sufficiently satisfied by the man’s presentation in the (MHA) Place of Safety, to admit him s2 MHA for 28 days. Does this not validate the officers impressions, that experienced mental health professionals also thought he was mentally disordered and sufficiently to justify 28 day detention in hospital? Yes, in my view.
500g plain flour, plus extra for dusting
Then we have the horrific car crash that is Billy Idol’s hash at White Christmas. Taken from his rarely-seen 2006 album Happy Holidays (and which also contains anodyne versions of Frosty the Snowman, God Rest Ye Merry Gentlemen and Auld Lang Syne amongst its 17 rotten tracks), it’s hardly the former William Broad at his lip-curling best, is it? As Ross says: “I might not have kept up with Billy's recent career (and when I say recent, I mean anything after 1988) but this was a major shock. It reminded me of a drunk pub singer going through one last number at the piano before closing time on Christmas Eve.” I couldn’t have put it better myself.
Last week we said goodbye to Paula from Sketch Saturday......
last first after before behind ahead
11. Can you tell what time of day it is? What time of year is it?
I'll definitely get through Juliet, Naked and hope to fit in the short stories around other books. I fear I may not be able to fit in Click, but will do my best to complete this challenge.
Once at Tacna, we crossed the street to the international bus terminal and wandered around until someone offered to take us to Arica. We could, theoretically, have taken a bus across, but the colectivo option seemed like much less of a hassle, since you only have to wait for the people in your car, not a whole busload of people. The drivers go around the bus station and hustle up five passengers going to Arica from Tacna. They give you customs forms to fill out, you give them money, and then everyone piles into a 90s-model Buick sedan and off you go. Even if you are a grown-up, you could still end up sitting in the middle front seat, and there may or may not be functioning seatbelts. The whole hour down to Arica I was stuck with my face inches from the rearview mirror and its collection of cherry air fresheners.
On arriving in Ripley I quickly got some brief directions to Butterly hill and found my self at the Talbot. Described as a Flat Iron style for its unusual shape, it was similar to the Three Tuns in Sheffield and Baltic Fleet in Liverpool, and was mainly reminiscent of a ship.
Meanwhile, the AG is asserting that these comments being made are mischievous and that there is “precedent in the Commonwealth” for a phased withdrawal.
A friend invited me over for dinner this week with the kids, and asked me to bring dessert.
Since my hard drive crashed, I wasn't able to keep up with my posts. Luckily my husband doesn't need his computer tonight so I am catching up on both blogs.
Naturally, I’m now thinking of entering a tournament just to see how I fare. I did watch the 60+ National Hardcourt championships on youtube recently, and the talent didn’t look all that fierce. The guys were deadly accurate, of course, but I didn’t see any athleticism I didn’t think I could handle.
It calms the nervous system. It’s good for the immune system. It’s also good for the heart; it helps produce nitric oxide (not nitrous oxide — that’s laughing gas!) in the arteries, dilating them and reducing blood pressure. It also smooths heart rhythms.
It’s hard to find anything original about this novel and even more difficult to find something to like about it. Perhaps it would have worked well as a summer blockbuster, but as a novel, it failed to impress.
But for now here's a little photographic update on the last few weeks by way of visual aid.
Since Chris had the day off, I thought he might enjoy spending it putting together Ryann's birthday present. HA. I think he hated me for the entire three hours it took. But damn, that little bitty blue kitchen is adorable! Because I'm a slave driver I made him mow the lawn that evening as well. Ryann yelled words of encouragement (or something like that) through the window while he was working.
The havoc of this week has left me with the opportunity to focus on my strengths…send my weaknesses packing and extend my plans to live my best life.
10.) Up (USA, 2009)
If you've read Sarah's excellent advice on Modern Country Style, you'll know that when making decisions on your kitchen, you should make sure your kitchen inspiration pics are rated no less than a 9 in your mind and scratch everything you don't feel is absolutely swoon worthy.
3.) The Nifong Usurpation: March 24-April 6, 2006
Here, I added lots of rings of raw red onion, a big handful of spring mix baby lettuce and spinach, lots of Parmesan cheese (not the canned stuff! It has to be fresh!), and a couple of Roma tomatoes, sliced.
Here she is with my hubby and I
P – High power radiofrequency amplifier
In the final part of this series, the concept of cloud storage will be explored further. Cloud storage, simply put, is the concept of storing information in secure locations online rather than on a hard disk on a PC, laptop or server. This has obvious benefits to both businesses and home users, not least enabling data backup and sharing, as well as device synchronising (Gladinet and iCloud). By utilising clustering and load balancing technologies, these solutions offer a much reduced risk to data loss through hardware failure. Furthermore, cloud storage is incredibly flexible and responsive to actual needs. Where traditionally, a business would have to purchase a SAN (or server in smaller cases) capable of not only supporting the existing needs but also the expected growth in needs over the SAN/ server’s lifespan, cloud storage allows business to rapidly increase their storage capacity and thus reduce wasted expenditure.
So around about 2006 all my classes became fortnightly (every two weeks) and things sort of worked out and fell into a bit of a pattern.
Lately, I’ve seen a lot of golfers heading down to Phoenix and Palm Springs to warm up their game. The most popular golf travel bag I’ve seen is the Ping upright cover. Most people in the customs line seem to have this cover. It stands up upright and can be pushed along in line. It’s a lot easier to manage than to pull it. Golf Town has it on sale for $168.88, a saving of $21.
X-Rays showed I had a punctured lung caused by my broken ribs and I spent a very un-jolly weekend strapped to an oxygen mask.
While Ms Saw has made millions of dollars during her tenure as CEO of SMRT, its standards of service have deteriorated rapidly over the years. Once seen as a proud product of Singapore Inc, SMRT has now become a laughing stock not only in the eyes of Singaporeans, but in the world as well for its frequent breakdowns and disruptions in service.
First up is Simon Bestwick (pictured left), whose actual Lake District tale, THE MORAINE, will make Ellen’s final cut, along with another story of his from last year, DERMOT, which appeared in BLACK STATIC #24.
Preheat oven to 350F. Butter and flour a 9x13-inch glass baking dish.
Georg: Bye bye!
Listed on the main board of the Singapore Exchange, Auric Pacific Group Limited is an investment holding company with diverse business interests ranging from the distribution of fast moving consumer food and non-food products, food manufacturing and retailing, the management of restaurant and food court operations and other strategic investments including property investment.
Enjoy your Saturday! May it be a scrappy one!
We can have frozen tuning devices, so set in our ways and religious cliques that the sound we make, God can still use for His good but its not quite the sound He wants to hear, playing an old song rather than His song.
1" Crystal Variety Pack
The 2nd floor of the shop is organized by size and had some lovely finds.
Today I have one word for you: Neem! “What is Neem?” I hear you ask. I discovered it by accident when I was given a little bag with essentials oils in it. It looked different and I had never heard of it, til then.
back he did more
Jesus wasn’t safe. Jesus was not the kind of kid you may have really wanted your kids hanging out with. “Johnny, I know Jesus may be an inspiring individual, but he’s so “against-the-flow”; he seems angry; he’s trying to throw off our church; he hangs out with a bad crowd.”
enemy – to say what he has not
The nine were among 12 men arrested on December 20 in what police said at the time were counter-terrorism raids essential to protect the public from the threat of attack.
Vegan has a meaning, let’s use it. And not try to transform it into something that it never was and shouldn’t ever be.
Check out that Gallic shrug; he was the quintessential Frog.
In other great news, I finally uploaded a bunch of photos to that digital photo frame I've had for over 2 years. It's sitting in the kitchen corner where I can see it from nearly every angle in the rooms I hang out in. I love seeing those pictures of Brandon, me, Dexter, Winston, and our families. It brings a smile to my face with every silly photo I put on there. Yay me.
This begs the crucial question as to why the Ting Pek King family were paying large sums of money into Michael Chia’s bank accounts? Accounts that were being simultaneously used to fund Musa Aman’s boys in Australia.
On Sunday morning, I was on a panel to discuss the use of social media to eliminate health disparities among minority populations. Although my program's forays into social media for HIV/STD prevention have been limited and inconclusive at best, I felt like I was at least able to convey the (ahem) challenges one must face when attempting to implement something new and not especially predicable at a government agency. That doesn't mean you can't change things in a bureaucracy, but it does mean you'd better take a mighty long view of things if you don't want to lose your head. It was great to hear that experience reaffirmed by several others while learning about their work.
Dora stepped forward, half-raising a hand, her eyes telling him just how much a Stable Rod wouldn't protect him from her. "Am I invisible? Am I not here or something?"
Making tempura, on the other hand, kind of is rocket science. After the beet is “fork tender” you are supposed to slice it paper-thin using a mandoline. Well, I don’t have that. (Hellooooooo Christmas list!) So I turned to Lily for her knife skills. Then you take the thin slices of beet, spread a bit of the “ricotta” mixture on the ends, and roll them up.
Have you read the Writing the Breakout Novel Workbook? What are you reading right now? Care to share a teaser?
Whenever a couple get engaged and plan their wedding apart from the dress, the biggest concern is where the wedding is going to be. They want to have it at a memorable and romantic place which will make them really enjoy the most important day of their life.
A new Inigo Manglano Ovalle sculpture is buoyantly suspended in space at the Art Institute, circumscribed by the spiral staircase of the museum’s contemporary wing. Taking the form of the famously capricious icebergs of the North Sea, this computer modeled lattice of tent-poles and plastic joints sends an oxymoronic message on one hand, creating a formal disjoint between random nature and artifice; on the other hand, the lattice, supported by black aluminum rods in its center, becomes a sort of floating membrane which easily dissolves in the metal glass world of the room’s modernist interior. Literally, the iceberg presents a world of joints, transparent solidity, and the idea of sculpture permeating space.
The Intention Experiment by Lynne McTaggart
Start by learning how to become a remarkable coach, by attending the two-day Coaching Training Camp. You’ll learn how to overcome the biggest obstacles to coaching, apply a six-part coaching model and develop your own plan for being an effective coach.
She calls out to House again. She walks toward the bedroom and spies House in bed, the sheets rumpled. She bends down and kisses house on the cheek and becomes startled. Dominika realizes House is dead. She clutches her belly and cries.
The news came before shortly before the new junta said Sunday it was closing all air and sea borders. That move was prompted by former colonial power Portugal’s announcement that it was sending two navy ships and a military plane for a possible evacuation of its nationals.
1/2c. bacon bits/ or cubed ham.
- Discovering something new about myself
Today’s crane flies have characteristically long legs and bodies and large, well-veined wings. These same features can also be seen in this 45-million-year-old crane fly fossilized in amber. The fact that this insect has preserved its same anatomy over 45 million years, with no change whatsoever, is a clear indication that it never evolved—and that it was created in possession of the same superior features it has now since it first came into existence on Earth.
Look at the beautiful shoes I gots:
12 minute AMRAP of:
Life has been maddeningly busy the past month. A lot of prep for the TX Multigun event took Trooper's time which left me everything else. Trooper RO'd the event (2:50m here) which was HUGE. I only went for a few hours on Sunday after his stage was shot by all and it was still uncomfortable for me. Too damn many people. I try to be supportive of Trooper's shooting but I am not that a fan of the Open class hooey. (Exhibit A which made me laugh my ass off.) In this video @ 2:10m is the range that I was able to shoot in practice a few weeks ago. Fun as hell, I'll admit, though glad I had the friends' shotgun - kinder, gentler.
Size: Approx. 6" deep with 6" diameter pot.
The 46-year-old Bergevin arrives from the Chicago Blackhawks’ front office where he held a variety of positions for the past seven seasons. Bergevin also played for the Blackhawks, one of eight teams for which he played during a 20-year career.
Definitely Barbara Michaels and Charles deLint. For me, reading their books was a chance to escape into another world.
Dress: borrowed from my aunt
Save Big On Folding Chairs Full Range Here - Free Delivery
You have missed a golden opportunity to be viewed as the adults in the national conversation. While Republicans did nothing but obstruct, which may I remind you was your tactic when you were the minority party, instead of rising above it and taking your case to the public you seemed to be more interested in pushing your agenda forward at all costs. Yes, we have problems in this country that need solutions, and some are so big that the federal government is the only plausible largesse available. But politics is the art of the possible, not the art of ram-it-down-their-throat, even if you are convinced that your beliefs are correct. By the way, that conviction doesn't separate you from anyone else.
So now rock and roll wildman Ted Nugent is finding himself being looked at for allegedly making a threat against Richard Milhous Obama, according to this liberal rag New York Magazine.
If you’d like to follow me on Twitter, I can be found at @MikeVooss
They do not understand natural law…”
Out there in the woods and along the road
Good house keeping starts with a good cleaning schedule, and there’s nothing like walking into a house that smells as good as it looks. When floors are washed, beds are made and dishes are put away, the family gains a sense of comfort in knowing that their surroundings are under control. Being clean and organized saves you both time and money. When all things are put in proper order you don’t have to spend minutes or hours looking for lost items. And when supplies are carefully organized, you can easily find them instead of replenishing stock. That's where a schedule like this comes in handy!
On the full 2011 stats, meanwhile, Sharp remained the dominant smartphone brand with 20.1 percent, followed by Fujitsu-Toshiba at 18.8 percent. Apple is at third with 14.2 percent, eclipsing Panasonic (10) Kyocera (9.7).
Carol Plumbly, a local kennel assistant, said: “It appears Liliana’s having a phantom pregnancy and her body’s acting as if she’s given birth. For a domestic dog, it’s very rare.”
It was 6:10pm and Karwar was now about 18k away. Once I made up my mind to get there, I didn’t have to look around for places to stay on the way and so I cycled fast at a nice steady cadence, covering the last 18k in under an hour. As it got dark, I was looking forward to seeing the twinkling lights of Karwar from atop the last big uphill, nestled like the previous town had been in a hollow by the sea. But that was not to be.
I picked some to put indoors and there the soft pink flowers darkened to a deeper shade. In my photo I caught some of the light shining through the fragile drying flowers, heart-breakingly lovely in their final moment! Read more about March lilies here as well as on Diana's blog Elephant's Eye.
Out in the sticks of Maine, roads being plowed really wasn’t much of a guarantee, so most of Maine’s residents are big of DIY’s. Maybe that’s why there’s a brood of cool old snowmobiles; necessities back out in Maine before they became toys in California. . .
I have listed a couple more things tonight and we have sorted all the bags out into winter/spring and summer clothing and washed and hung some jackets to list tomorrow.
Next a woman appears
The Detroit News: Robbed by blowtorch, Pontiac clerk gets cash back with a batn 18-year-old Shelby Township man is in custody after allegedly attempting to rob a store with a propane torch and was later beaten by the baseball bat-wielding clerk.
Your 2013 self
Naturally, somebody from that august organization, that being my buddy and brother in geekery, John Frasier, caught that idle rambling thought of mine, and we talked offline about it for a bit. I figured the reference wouldn’t make it past my editor or the good folk at CBS Licensing, but when I was given provisional clearance (as in, “Try not to go overboard…you know, for once.”), I decided to throw caution to the winds.
journaling, per se. I know Smash books & Project Life is really on trend,
I have been asked a few times how it is I have so much time to sew. Its true, I spend a lot of time sewing. However, 2.5 days of the week my girls are with their dad and the choice is either housework or sewing. Yah, sewing wins.
5. Give It Up
Nobody wants to think of bad things happening.
Don’t get me wrong. We are still looking at the writing style from the first book that I loved. He has a very distinct writing voice that I love and connect to really deeply. I think we’re looking at the same problem as with second book: I just don’t care about the topics. Okay, that’s not completely true. From what I remember, there are two essays that really stuck out to me. And that’s because they were about musical artists that I really like (or at least they were related to them in some small way)–Britney Spears and Led Zeppelin (Yes, I know that’s a weird combination but I am a child of the ’90s trapped with the musical mentality of a stoner in the ’70s. Therefore, I can like both. Deal with it). Other than that, I remember things about the White Stripes and Metallica and some other stuff that I couldn’t care less about (However, there was something about REO Speedwagon, Journey, and Def Leppard or something. I forget but they were three classic rock bands that I love and I still couldn’t get into it). Anyway, that was run in number one with the slow decay of something that got me really excited at the beginning in the world of books.
Palais des Festivals, Cannes
Dec. 14: Hard Rock Live, Orlando, FL
Polygraph tests for anyone at Regional Organiser level or above, which includes non members These tests are expensive but very effective at rooting out infiltrators and they have to be prioritised. We cannot afford to let in any more moles into positions of authority from which they can wreck our Party’s future. The tests should be undertaken compulsorily, from the Leader downwards.
scrambling over the height of the garden,
It is actually not easy to ask. It incorrectably admits, that you don’t know. And which adult wants to admit it to have a need of help? I guess, we all should use it all the time, if not loudly, then at least quietly, to understand, how things are working, to find the problem and to find a/any solution/suggetion to it.
You've found your hands and feet...
To The ODI LOST podcast (Anil) and Vozzek69 (Danny): What can I say that we haven't already shared in our "off air" conversations about our getting together. Thank You for letting me be part of the podcast and for your constant support. And for respecting and making sure I wasn't privy to any spoilers...ever!!
PS. I'm selling clothes again. Liz Lisa replicas. Comment here - or there - if interested.
Book: Melissa Cole - Let Me Tell You About Beer.
Interestingly enough, the half day (Friday) was the most packed of them all, in terms of "events."
Since they aren't too opaque, I think these lenses would look best if you have light colored eyes and want both the enlargement and the halo effect without looking super unnatural. Also, if you have dark brown eyes like me and would like a more natural looking lens that shows the halo effect, I recommend giving these a try.
Monday- Strength and Stretch. My legs are still feeling pretty heavy so I am planning on hitting the pool for a few laps and laying off the weights today.
All these years later, I still think of the True Colors collaboration as a very singular moment in time, when a group of artists put forward their best work and entered into friendships that still thrive and deepen today.
Iván Meade - What’s the most important lesson you have learned about making gardens?
Leave a comment below letting me know which Asian meal you would like to see as a part of the Wanchai Ferry Lineup.
Allonsanfàn is a wry, strange look at the absurd tragedy of radical Italians. It technically takes place in the early 19th century, but it could be just as home in the 1860s, 1920s or 1970s. In fact, especially the 1970s - a decade in which domestic terrorism killed Aldo Moro and laid bombs in Bologna's train station. A decade where the idealism of 1968 had ripened into a hyper-violent, extreme nihilism (both on the Left and the Right), where killing became a currency of discourse. (Thanks, Paul Ginsborg, by the way, for teaching the PPCC about modern Italian history! Seriously, readership, A History of Contemporary Italy is wonderful.)
Main Characters: 4/5
Middleham Park Racing
But the new arrival is a mixed blessing, because it also eats other legumes, including soybeans. This video was prepared by entomologists at the University of Georgia College of Agricultural and Environmental Science.
there are words
Notes: This is not a spicy preparation, add one green chilli along with the powders, if you want it spicier.
60ml bourbon
For me - even if it's just a pile of papers - I want it to be aesthetically pleasing to my eye. Maybe it is my Virgo nature, or perhaps it is a mental illness, whatever it is I am all about putting things in a place to enhance their beauty!
All day and all night.
Look, I get it, I really do. However, for a console that has a ton of online content for sale forcing gamers into a Live Gold sub with a TOO small hard drive is also forcing them to upgrade that HDD within a week or less to a bigger (and overpriced) 360 drive. Not every gamer out there is going to seek out a non-OEM solution and yes, Microsoft knows this. It’s the same “deal” they had when they came out with the Arcade model 360 a few years back that gave new users the smallest memory card storage possible and NO hard drive all the while touting the benefits of Xbox Live membership (meaning you were sucked into a “low” price point that escalated the minute you connect your console and start downloading demos or other free stuff).
9 pm Girls Guns & Glory @ Mercy Lounge – Check out “Temptation” on Sin City Social Club Vol. 11
First stop was Monte Carlo, which definitely lived up to all of the hype. I didn’t want to go inside, because if I go inside, I really want to make an event of it. You know, get dressed up, pay to gamble in the nice rooms, that sorta thing. I’m saving that for France Trip #2.
Suddenly I feel like a blank hand but I’m not down. If I could get back to my DT friends, it would be terriffic. But I don’t want to. If I can reach my LV8 school friends, It’ll be wonderful. But I’m not on the mood. Now, somehow, I just want to let all of my past go. Now I just want to make new friends (from now) as much as I can and I know I’ll make a lot because of who I am now – who i just find – can surely do it.
Hope you like~ For more accurate descriptions, click on the link under each of the photos. This will take you directly to the shop. And I just looked up my last Giveaway – it was January of last year. Geez!
away from each other.
This past June, I had lunch with my friend Alison who worked with Paula and me at that downtown agency. Alison was an account executive under Paula. She too had moved to Long Beach, and also eventually wound up working at Disney. I met her in Burbank and we had a wonderful lunch, kicking around old times and catching up.
Finally, I stop walking. I can’t believe I’m doing this. Before long, I’m standing back in front of the shack again. Inside, I find that Meeko has not moved. Do you want to follow me, dog? He wags his tail and starts barking. Is that a yes? I take a few steps outside of the shack, and sure enough, the dog follows. So, I guess this is happening now.
The Chopin works performed in the second half were different from those previously advertised (the E major Nocturne, op.62 no.2, and the third sonata). There was little to regret, though. The opening Nocturne, op.55 no.2, presented not an old world Chopin, but one whose sparkle, not least in the trills, looked forward to Debussy and Ravel. Dramatic rhetoric in the opening of the third Scherzo made me eager to hear Goode in Liszt; there was certainly a touch of Mephistopheles here, and the final climax proved as diabolical as anything in Liszt’s own music. One should not forget, though, the delicacy with which Goode made Chopin’s decoration sing: not ‘mere’ decoration, but true, melodic inspiration. The two op.64 waltzes performed (nos 2 and 3) charmed without skating over the very real depths to be found here, especially the yearning of the C-sharp minor waltz. For me, the only disappointment was the A-flat Ballade. Its fluency impressed, but here, and only here, I sensed that there was more to the music than was being revealed on the present occasion. Perhaps I have been listening too often to the ever- rigorous Maurizio Pollini.
I was fine .I looked in too his eyes once and saw this sadness ,and the thought came into my mind ,like he told me mentally ,and I knew what he was thinking .
From the moment we know life is inside us,we feel a responsibility to protect and defend that human bein
So come with open eyes and open ears,
There we go easy as pie. YUMMM! I have the desire to make more pies with weird fruit combinations.
We have started this blog to share our little, but wonderful, world of life in lingerie…. the laughs, the lows, the down right cheeky and of course the lustworthy!! We hope you can join us on the journey……
Yessir, I’m a pretty cool gorilla who’s totally at one with creation. My mental state is a-okay without any of your LSD or magic toadstools – and if it ain’t broken, I don’t fix it.
“They will do anything and everything to wrest power,” he said when asked about his message for the delegates at the celebrations.
If you determine that you need to live somewhere else for a while, there are certain places you can stay without maxing out your budget. First, check to see if you can stay at a friend’s or relative’s house. You will feel comfortable knowing your kids are safe in the comforts of your loved ones and you will not have to spend a fortune on renting a space.
The book was a mix of personal narratives, medical procedures, and Monday morning inquires. I was slightly disappointed with the brevity of the Monday morning meetings. I suppose I was expecting a longer and more in depth inquiry, but this was rendered unnecessary because Gupta spent considerable time explaining the procedure and error prior to the meeting. Due to the nature of the book, it was slightly hard to comprehend the medical procedures being described. There were portions of the book where I understood only the general idea of what was happening – a result of not knowing the medical name for every part of the body. Obviously, Gupta couldn’t include a definition of every medical word he used, but I felt the terminology would be a barrier to some readers.
Goldie was folding laundry today and came across a dress with little hearts all over it. One of the girls at Children's Hour has the same dress and wore it on Wednesday for the Valentine's Party. Goldie wore a different dress, but I still pointed out what her friend had on.
Ricky Sargent, a football and track coach in Hempstead, Texas, was fired last week for leaving two seniors behind at a restaurant for about an hour, at night, after they misbehaved and refused to get back on the team bus.
” Wow, are you handsome, sir. Are you impotent ?”
In a strapless, ivory gown that truly captured the romance of the evening, Jillian held a bouquet of light pink and cream roses, and cream calla lilies, and made her way down an aisle covered in pink and cream rose petals arranged in a swirl design.
stays/corset — less uncomfortable than those of Georgian or Victorian Eras and typically stays were worn instead of full corsets though the term corset was being applied to both. The ones we think of when someone mentions “corset” today are the Victorian ones.
Additional pieces of inspiration for this room -
Sleeping. Sleeping with the craw;ers but ignoring them.
The beer pours a nice dark amber color as you would expect from the style of beer that it is. A nice mix of citrus fruit, hops and malt are the first things you notice when you smell the beer. Also notice a sweetness (maybe caramel from the sugar).
And washed all of my sins away,
There is simply no Australia Celebration without a game of cricket. Lego Lover has really gotten into the game this season. Not so much watching it on the telly, but having a hit in the backyard with dad.
The Supreme Court decided by a majority of five to four that the decision to exclude M was in contravention of section one of the Race Relations Act. Supreme Court president Lord Phillips and Supreme Court Justices Lady Hale, Lord Mance, Lord Kerr and Lord Clarke found that the school directly discriminated on racial grounds against child M and others like him. Judge Lord Rodger, said the decision "… produces such manifest discrimination against Jewish schools in comparison with other faith schools…"
Hope you enjoyed this eye candy on a Friday morning. What are your plans this weekend? We have friends coming in from the city tomorrow for the night. Planning a BBQ and some pool time of course. My favorite greek chicken and blueberry crisp are on the menu. Yum.
ChikaLicious
Save $0.75 when you buy ONE BOX MultiGrain Cheerios cereal.
So this brings my score of non-advertising copy in a list of best advertising copy to two out of three. Sorry.
I really felt like I needed to add something else to my nails today. I could no longer stand Mavala Liberty's lack of colour. My hands just looked so pale with this polish.
Their families out there living happily in the native thinking with pride that their family member is working Abroad, earning big working in a foreign country.
Ashtavakra said,
It was a lovely to see the children making up new games and having fun. Especially as today was tinged with sadness. Brendan's Hamster, Cupcake, passed away last night and we are all a bit sad. She was 2.5 years though and had a good life. We went out for tea and cake at the Antique center, after school, to cheer us up and Brendan had a look around his favorite rooms in there. The garden one and the toys in the attic.
But not when you're BYU, and this is your fourth straight loss. And not when you're playing Utah State -- one of the worst college football programs in the nation -- a team you've beaten ten straight times, and twenty of the last twenty one times. And not when it's nationally televised.
I buy one and open it.
"Oh that ran out quickly shall we just order another one?"
If you are very, very sensitive to obscene language and explicit sex, don't read it. (And by the way, it's not for children). If you are nauseated by graphic violence, don't read it or skim it and go on.
The air coming up from the subway is cooler than the air on the street... a sure sign that the times are changing. All winter long as one sinks into the depths of the subway, the air coming at you can be counted upon to be warmer than the incredible chill felt on the street.
So, Higson delivers the most important thing with a story like The Enemy. It is scary; the reader is left breathless; it is uputdownable. He also has a terrific metaphor, that of adults eating their own young. What makes this even better is the cast of nuanced characters -- a quite large cast, actually, because there are quite a few storylines. So even better that each person (Sam, Arran, Achilleas, Ollie, Maxie, Blue) is fully drawn. With just a few lines (because with this cast and the nonstop action Higson only has time for a few lines), Higson portrays a real kid.
Cheer up, girl, for God’s sake! Halve yourself a tomato, pour yourself a stiff coconut water and lighten up for once.
“The guru must be situated on the topmost platform of devotional service. There are three classes of devotees, and the guru must be accepted from the topmost class…….. Such a guru can accept disciples from all over the world. Prithivim sa sishyat. This is the test of the guru.”
Do you - or would you - use your personal Facebook profile to try to sell your books to your friends in a bit of blatant, shameless advertising? If so, please tell me off. But while doing so, please tell me how it's different from a friend who is - say - a plumber advertising his plumbing skills to me, or a friend who is a lawyer trying to get me to use his legal services on the back of our online/real friendship. Or perhaps it isn't different and you think it's OK. Isn't flagrant commercialism what LinkedIn is for, not Facebook? If I met a friend in the street and (s)he said 'why don't you buy my book? it makes a great Christmas present,' would that be OK? I don't think it would. Or am I just being an old fogey?
This one is red, well worn. The door handle is very large, dark metal, iron maybe. The keyhole is massive. I peer through, but already know I can’t see what is on the other side. None of the 17 keys I’ve been given are large enough to fit. Another door closed to me. I move on.
The ethnic and epic dimensions of the Guyanese people must also be examined. The long and short of the position is that he or she must make the people agree.
Well, my planning for the trip was during the
I only remember the first one, so you need to go to the show and tell me what the second one is :D
My taffy...
Materials : Quality Spandex Jersey Cotton (Top Notch)
Dinner was good. Drinking red and lying next to you felt even better.
Yes, I am a horrible person. A horrible person who actually considered dangling a Benjamin in front of that boy and daring him to fetch it with his teeth, but nooooooo - he had to go off and pull a heist and be a big frickin' antihero about it. Whatever, buddy.
I let my pleasant daydream float away, applying my concentration on what Jason and I had presumed to be the owners of the house. There they were, next to each other in the middle of the living room, bound to dining chairs by duct tape and gagged with washcloths held in place by more duct tape.
Shocking as it may be, I actually did read enough books to fulfill Peril the First, which I'd signed up for. I also read a nice handful of short stories and watched a few movies. Where I really dropped the ball was in actually talking about them. :P (I've actually come up with a label--I think I'm what you could call a "haphazard blogger.")
Unfortunately it's our 40th this year but it's never so bad when you use the buddie system. LOL!!
Moving forward, yes, there are going to be risks, but aren’t there risks with any pregnancy? Maybe the risks are higher, but there are multiples born everyday that are healthy and normal. Our first daughter was an at-risk pregnancy. The doctor didn’t give her very good odds either. She is a miracle baby!
Children with gender identity disorder may manifest coexisting separation anxiety disorder, generalized anxiety disorder and symptoms of depression.
The Kansas Restaurant
intoxicated throat burn
The crayfish were on a base of canned cream of celery (the real thing would have separated in an hour) and was based on a picture from choosy beggars that the director had loved. The canned soup stayed exactly the same all day long (it was never intended to be eaten, only seen). The parsley oil did dissipate over the course of many hours and a crayfish being removed to a plate for 4 takes.
When we seek to see the Spirit in others in this way, strangers as well as friends, we are taking the first and very necessary step to becoming aware of that Spirit. In many cultures, looking into other people’s eyes is the highest honor we can pay them. Becoming committed to doing this, increases our peace of mind while showing others that they matter to us, too. Honoring others in this way may not feel natural at first, but if they have crossed our path, this is what we have been called to do.
William Smith has done us all a favor by reminding us of the need we have to love. Even if our experience of human love has been deficient, our experience of divine love has not. This encourages us to press on in loving others well. I particularly enjoyed the frank reality of chapter 5 on longsuffering love. Anytime I read an author who says, “Nearly two years later, their marriage fell apart again. Life is like that, isn’t it? Very few of us – none of us – live fairy-tale endings (page 70)” I know I am in the presence of someone who has experienced the sting of counseling relationships that don’t end well. The honesty is refreshing, and this book is saturated with it. When the ideal is being upheld, you are told so. When the grit of grace is required, you’re told so. That connected with me.
Upon drawing the last card in the deck, or immediately upon drawing the cards in bold face, the deck disappears.
Visit nearby grocery stores and ask for containers as well as cartons. They come at inexpensive price. They can even supply you a few cartons free of cost because they are useless for them. You can also gather packaging containers along with other packing supplies from the packers and movers company. But it will be expensive to purchase packaging supplies from the moving firm store. You can easily obtain good quality packaging containers in the grocers. You can even collect wood containers in the fruit suppliers as well as spirits shop.
I followed Valorie's blog posts and her appeals for help.
So now you have a candidate that isn't going to energize the base (a la, GWB) and isn't going to grab the centrists, which is what the winning candidate must have to win this election. The Republicans, sensing disaster, do what they do better than the Democrats: smear. Only this time, there's no "and here's what our candidate will do that's better" to follow the mudslinging.
After a few year's hiatus, the trio returned with a brand new name. Their ongoing game of label hopscotch continued as they found themselves back on Time Coast, but now rechristened as The Zarkons despite no change in line up or sound. 1985's Riders In The Long Black Parade treads similar sonic waters as Nightmare City, although not as successfully. What sounded fresh in 1981 now seemed stale, and lukewarm production with vocals buried too deeply in the mix didn't help. The high point of the album, Chai doing her best Grace Slick imitation on a cover of "White Rabbit," was somewhat underwhelming; the remainder of the record is not bad - just unnecessary.
Corporatism of 51% is finished. The Kaianerehkowa of one mind shall lead the way.
Directed by Zal Batmanglij, with a cast including Christopher Denham, Nicole Vicius, Brit Marling, Avery Pohl, and Richard Wharton, the film plays with science fictional elements, like "He" and "She" from the Heaven's Gate cult, by exploring the claims of a young woman that she is a time traveler from the future. A young couple explore, first with skepticism, then drawn in, as viewers wonder if she is really from another time or they have been lured into the web of a deep and disturbing cult and for what purpose?
Take all vegetable ends and egg shells and boil in large stock pot for three hours
So, there was that.
In-house ad for a book about Shaun, probably composed of articles from past issues of Tiger Beat, followed by a page about Shaun's most difficult choice: should I be a rock star? Television star? It's OK, Shaun, you can be both:
Typically, trainees are advised to roll on a designated area about 10-15 times. However, if you are wondering about specific motions and techniques, check out the brief video below on behalf of Cressey Performance.
Getting that content isn’t too difficult at all. If you are not inclined to write helpful articles about your industry, or about general business tips – such as time management, or how to increase productivity – then you can obtain content for free on the Internet. Just do a quick search for ‘Free Reprint Articles’ and you will find thousands upon thousands of articles that you can use in your newsletter. And the newsletter itself is not difficult to manage. Services such as aweber.com that I use personally are very inexpensive, they automate the entire process, and they take care of CAN-SPAM compliance by including an automated unsubscribe link at the end of your newsletters.
Mrs. Sneed has settled into a retirement routine. She worked at her old job 6 days in February and that served to reinforce her decision to retire. Getting up and going off to a job sucks, once you have gotten out of the habit.
Blunt was terrific albeit far too tall, and too pretty to be historically accurate. But that’s trivial. More importantly, as the main course, and topic of the film, she was a treat. Bettany as Lord Melbourne was great. I didn’t much care for Rupert Friend as the Queen’s cousin who married her. He was a dreamer and a liberal thinking man, and that’s not what the Queen’s handlers wanted for her.
I spoke to the vet yesterday and he's comfortable with some improvement but his exact words were, "he's not out of the woods yet". They're wanting to do an MRI on him to try and find out whats wrong!! I haven't been able to get through to them so far today!! I've had a rather emotional conversation with Pete as neither of us want him to have to put him through even more surgery and are also waiting to hear from the insurance company to ensure they'll cover this episode!!
"On top of the buffet is a tray my sister got for me when she went to the Gien Factory in the south of France. I had nowhere to put my small white milk glass collection so this seemed like the best place.
Now that Kathryn Bigelow has made it safe for us to recklessly court macho annihilation again, let's examine one of the more respected and controversial military leaders of our time-- General George Patton, and the 1970 film that bears his name, starring George C. Scott, which I recently had the pleasure of acquiring on an excellent blu-ray disc, and which is highly recommended to fans of THE HURT LOCKER (2009), THE DEER HUNTER (1977) and APOCALYPSE NOW (1979) and anyone whose ever had a heart, who wouldn't turn around and expose its flank to daily howitzer bombardments... or who is interested in this new Tom Hanks-produced mini-series, THE PACIFIC (though Patton wasn't in the Pacific, it's still the same God-damned wonderful war!)
In person, Emin is slighter and prettier than photographs suggest. She has a gentle manner that at times borders on vulnerability, and she is incredibly soft-spoken, despite her Estuary accent. When I arrived at her house this afternoon, her first priority was to introduce me to her mother, who was sitting by the fire in an upstairs drawing room. As I leave and make my way out into the cold, I struggle to connect Emin’s past with the woman she is now. I can’t help but think that the kind of girl who makes a point of introducing you to her mother is exactly the kind you would want to introduce to your own.
What was Jesus known for? I think for his love which was rooted in his relationship to the Father, demonstrated in deeds and words. And remaining true through humble everyday activity, a mission with disciples who more often than not didn’t get it, to the cross in which all hell seemed to break loose (and surely did) on Jesus.
goodluck!!
Dennis Altman is Professor of Politics and Director of the Institute for Human Security at Latrobe University and a prominent public intellectual. Among his myriad publications, his groundbreaking book Homosexual: oppression and liberation (1971) influenced the politics of gay liberation across the world.
448140 Family clothing stores
That's sad. And sadder that you are taking pleasure in airing her dirty laundry on a message board.
Today, however, was something of a tipping point for me. I've already had icky feelings (quietly, and in my own brain) over what feels like the publishing industry gaining (or attempting to exert) more "control" over blogging. It started with ARCs. Everyone wanted ARCs. Publishers started e-mailing, authors started e-mailing, the review copies started sliding through the door. This was years ago, mind you. But publishers started dangling carrots! Unlike most, I have never felt one iota of obligation to review a book unless it's something I specifically requested from a publisher or publicist. Even then, I make it really clear that if I don't want to review a book, I won't. If I don't like it. If I'm too busy. Because it's my blog. And my blog is mine.
There is so much I could share about this book. I could probably write an entire blog inspired by it. But for now I will just share few quotes from it that have deeply encouraged me in the past few days. I hope they do the same for you.
is a matter of letters,
Lateral track with high percentage of high speed corners
I hope I am happier with the new black painted ones I also had a couple of old purple frames which I am painting black since the paint on them has started to chip..............
Category: Politics / Current Events
Dr Gorenflo, of Penn State University said: ‘We looked at regions important for biodiversity conservation and measured their linguistic diversity in an effort to understand an important part of the human dimension of these regions.
This month's muse at Gingersnap Creations is Laura Carson. She also just happens to be one of my muses so this bit of news made me very happy. If you are not familiar with her work, I encourage you to visit her blog, Artfully Musing to see why her work is so inspiring.
I like it,” Eric said. “I like it a lot.” He turned to her and smiled. “Robbie’s very lucky.”
Felani means disposable. Felani is really disposable to our Government. Felani’s death is not important enough to seek justice for or start a trial process.
You are honest in humility
His image was used by the Weekly World News on November 9, 1993 for front-page article, "Half-human, half-alligator discovered in Florida swamp." The periodical subsequently reported on his escape from captivity, killing of a Miami man, and giving birth.
A few years ago my boss had our volunteer services team read a book called “The Five Love Languages” by Gary Chapman. At first I was a little confused about why in the world she would ask us to read this book for work. BUT it didn’t take me very long to figure out the benefit of this book in my work, and also in my home.
"They slapped me around, constantly asking me: 'where is your jewellery, where is your money? Where are the keys to your safe?" she said. She remained calm and told her son: "let us pray'. The next moment he started praying loudly, 'Lord, please help us.'
Social and environmental effects
For those interested in reviewing I have a review pdf
I think week four was the worst, in a general sense. Two of the seven days were terrible runs, but the bright side is I totally learned a lesson. Apparently it was an important one, because I made the same mistake twice. I think God might have been telling me something here?
I enjoyed the Mark Henry-Randy Orton match, I just wonder how long Mark’s title reign will last?
With a well concocted blend of self-discovery, history, time-traveling, and even a little mystery, Ruby Red has provided me with an entertaining and compelling read painted against one of my favorite settings. England. Seriously, I have a weak spot for stories that take place in England. The whole concept behind Ruby Red is original and keenly crafted by Gier. In this first installment of her trilogy, I was introduced to a wide variety of characters as well as taught the background and history of our little time-traveling society and families. That being said, I was never bored or confused, finding myself intrigued by every ounce of the story. There was a lot of set up in Ruby Red and I am so excited to see how the family dynamics and potential romance will develop, as well as what secrets and truths will be revealed, in the next book. I already have an idea about one thing that might happen and there was some predictability in this particular book but I can tell that this is a trilogy I'm going to absolutely devour.
Melt 1 cup butter in a saucepan (on low heat).
Mr. Margaret Bassackwards: She’s going to be seven-years-old next week. A well-adjusted child, really.
"Nooney initially became interested in the borough in 1976, while working as a volunteer for George McGovern's presidential campaign. Two years later, she used the connections she had made in order to gain access to rooftops and other vantage points for a survey of the borough. She soon became more interested in the people she met and began photographing families in their homes. Many of these sitters then recommended other potentially willing subjects."
The test is at 5. Which is suppertime up here.
Hi, friends!
Except past relics and old love poems,
And without batting an eye, she said, “Well, that was the whole point.”
And now, almost at the end, I’m finally putting up the the color film from Afrikaburn. The black and white film, which comprises the majority of what I took at Afrikaburn and throughout this semester, won’t be ready until I get back. Though a lot of it is developed thanks to the UCT darkroom and my efforts impersonating a UCT Art student, I ran out of money for scanning. Oh well.
We went in about 5 mile chunks all day through the heat. The first of which was at the third gate cache. It had more water than we thought, but not a lot. The second of which was in a small cave west of the trail which was so small, only one person could fit, so we strung up my tarp and huddled under it for shade cooking some lunch up. Then we heard a rumor of chili and beer at Barrell Springs. On the word “beer,” we packed up and walked five more miles there to find nothing but a spring.
To: UN Secretary General Ban Ki-moon
And in case this has all been more than somewhat indigestible, here's a picture of a delicious memory from Warsaw - a slice of virtual cake for you to have with your coffee. Enjoy the thought!
Intelligent hauntings are ones where the spirit hasn't "crossed over" and for whatever reason they stay behind. These are things like getting poked in the back, feeling someone stand over you or watch you, having an arm or leg grabbed, etc. She thinks that spirits that linger have the same personality as they did when they were alive. Therefore if you have a playful "ghost" that person was more than likely a jokester in real living life.
Non-judgmental- I do my best not to pass judgement on anyone. I am pretty laid back and easy going. Yes, I get mad at people who go through the drive-thru regularly, but I mostly just am upset because I want to help them and I am not quite sure how at this point.
And Roosevelt and his political allies practiced what they preached. As UPI financial journalist Martin Hutchinson has pointed out, the USA in the 1940s was a place "with price controls, government licensing of transportation, state intervention in the steel and auto industries, interest rates that were set by Treasury fiat and a capital market in which banks were not allowed to operate. Also a "democracy" in which electoral districts were wildly unequal and 15 percent of the population was denied the vote." By modern-day standards the USA of that time had considerable Fascist elements too. American Leftism was Fascist even then. As Stromberg also notes:
Get Out, Get Arty – Thursdays 1pm-3pm at Wolfe Road Healthy Living Centre – get out of the house and meeting new people, learn and develop new art skills using a variety of different mediums, support from art teacher and health development nurse. Cost: nominal charge Contact: Clair Liversidge, Foxhill Medical Centre – 0114 232 2055
"Look around yourself, Dora." Raising his voice, Rel drowned out whatever Taslin was trying to say. "This is the First Realm. It's our business. They've kept everything here a total secret from us. Is that right or fair?"
Depending on the dismantle of joke unitedly with noesis within the offender, project to use deprecative phrases or combinations within the masses:
And she packed it all up in a Publix reusable grocery bag. Which made me love her, instantly. I love you, Vanessa!
One that only came to my realization today.
The rhubarb is up and unfurling it's leaves. The asparagus is tentatively making it's way above ground, raspberry leaves are appearing, the strawberries are greening and our 2 flowering trees/bushes are budding. Definitely spring. Spinach and lettuce are coming up, too.
Three Kings (Charles Roven, Edward L. McDonnell and Paul Junger Witt, producers)
In the mean time, send Ken some love in the form of some healing thoughts, vibes and prayers, for a quick and uneventful turn around. And, we promise to be back shortly, or hopefully Ken promises to be back shortly, for another update on Mission 3 and any necessary detours that may need to happen at this juncture. Once again, thank you one and all for your continued understanding and support of us here at Mission iPossible. It does not go unnoticed, and is greatly and humbly, appreciated.
7. Du Og Meg – Of Montreal
wrapped around your neck
Most of my meat purchases are from the reduced section in my grocers meat market. I also buy lots of my produce this way as well.
The Mobile 2012 conference just ended a few weeks ago. Get all of the presenter’s handouts, materials, and links on their conference wiki.
And then I got sick myself from some bug I brought home. (No picture of me, sorry. I'm not even remotely cute when I'm sick.)
Besides the Statue of Liberty, I didn’t realize the United States of America made tourism advertising. Cities and states run ads. But the entire country? Seems an unwieldy proposition, given our nation’s vast size and wildly disparate peoples. But they do. Above is a TV commercial called Land of Dreams produced by JWT, New York. The client is, in fact, the United States Government. I wonder (jokingly of course) if the President approved the concept.
Ahi Amarillo or Ahi Panko Paste (optional)
But I have a dilemma. Do I paint them white, for the ultimate in flexibility, or do I go crazy with colour? These chairs may be going to a new home with a client of mine, and she's happy to give me carte blanche as far as colour is concerned. If only there weren't so many gorgeous options! Like these:
You are allowed one coat - more than one and you must count it as part of your 10 items.
But that aside, the quality isn't half bad at all here.
All done except for one room.. The spare room...
In my mind I will go frolic in a meadow today and honor the Lord and Lady on this Beltane!
Australia has five states and territories; I live in South Australia, noted for great wine making and hosting international arts festivals. That is why Australia calls us the “Festival State.” My family migrated to Australia from England in the 1960s when I was a child, so all of us can claim to be well and truly Aussies by now.
And ahhh. Grounded. That’s just what I want to feel.
A few weeks ago this little post popped up on the fabulousness that is Rock My Wedding. It was about bridesmaids and the many controversies they can cause: who to choose, indifference from those who have been asked, and, the big one, what the hell to dress them in.
St. Paddy's Greetings!
As with something else, noobs will usually start small anyway. They’ll be playing low stakes video games with higher rake percentages. Ought to you really feel that this really is way too simple to suit your needs, move up to greater stakes and also you could perhaps see yourself profiting within the game titles as properly. Not only do you decrease the rake per hand since there is a cap, you take on a much bigger portion in percentage from the pot than the casino does. Add the rakebacks and also you obtained oneself a definitely sweet option. 1 far more thing to note, you would not need to package with other players who've attitude difficulties.
Dead Boy Talking opens: "In 25 minutes I will be dead .... they say it takes about 25 minutes to bleed to death." It takes a little longer to read the book but not much as its breathless style and urgent plot make you read quickly, eager to find out how it ends. And it's only 168 pages long.
Cream faux sheep pillows from last year’s winter collection at Pottery Barn
But wait! Stop right there, you little scamps. Because this week's posts may still be of interest to at least some of you, as they'll all be on an espionage tip. Yes, it's Espionage Week here at Existential Ennui, which will consist of a series of posts on espionage-themed books. I should point out there's no great plan at work here (which won't come as much of a surprise to regular readers, I'm sure): serendipitously I just happened to end up with or read a bunch of books that fall into the spy fiction category, so Espionage Week it is – or Spy Week, or Spooks Week, or Secret Service Week, or whatever you wanna call it. Hopefully, barring disaster or a sudden systemic failure of enthusiasm, there'll be posts on John le Carre, Ian Fleming, and one other author who shall remain nameless for the moment, but who'll be of particular interest to Book Glutton.
Please know brothers and sisters that I do not put forward this testimony as a formula, God forbid. The key point of this testimony is this Joh 2:5 His mother saith unto the servants, Whatsoever he saith unto you, do it.
You lost America to Globalist’s,
When Peach was diagnosed, I was encouraged to reach out to these people, and I didn't (still haven't) because I knew, even in the first confused moments of this nightmare, that Peach's journey would have a different outcome. And I felt incredibly guilty about that. I thought it was too soon for these people to be supporting anyone but their own families and how selfish it would be to drag them back into this world when they've barely begun to crawl out of it themselves.
It will be seen that all we have examined so far consists of the vibrations in the outer and middle ear. The vibrations are constantly passed forward, but so far there is still nothing apart from a mechanical motion. In other words, there is as yet no sound.
Does anyone else have this problem or is it just me? (Please tell me it's not just me!!)
She considered it
Beastie Boys - An Open Letter to NYC (Sonic Reducer theme)
And, though I have always liked giraffes,
Tests- 61, Runs- 5410, Avg- 56.94, 100s- 15, High- 211
The rules are simple enough, and can be read here. Each day a new mom writer is featured, along with her latest book. At the bottom of each post is a question that focuses on one aspect of the writing life, and you only need to answer the question in 50-200 words (in the comments section) to be entered in a drawing to win that book. I’ve won several great books in the past, which is a lovely perk, but to me, the real draw is examining my writing life once a year, by answering a series of probing questions by Christina Katz, herself an accomplished (and local!) writer. And I enjoy reading others’ responses. So what are you waiting for!
New Mexico by Johnny Cash
Many make the mistake of going back to hang out with their former colleagues and this only adds to their frustrations. His advice: Make a conscious effort to keep away from your former colleagues for at least six months. Concentrate on your new job and build up new relationships first. Then hanging out with old friends after that won’t be so traumatic.
admit mistakes and feel empathy for those who are hurting. Some simple
20 lira is not what she pays for that very same
I've been raising hell with airlines to charge fat/obese people extra for years, but that's another subject.
Esther Grimm, executive director of 3Arts said, “While this was a challenging journey, we are grateful to have garnered so much enthusiasm and support in the process -- most especially from our anchor partners, Sherwood Conservatory of Music and Timeline Theatre Company. We are committed to working with these partners in the coming years, and are very fortunate to be able to make the transition to a new and important future.”
It's about the spontaneous happenings, the chance encounters, the making of new friends, the renewing of old acquaintances and the often surreal experiences that make this event such a great success. And the beer.
Then Madrid began to drop off from the need to press intently, perhaps feeling heavy legs set-in after an immense effort in the Nou Camp on Saturday evening and Schweinsteiger saw some joy in his ball-carrying role from deep, but it was another willing runner, David Alaba who crossed for Arjen Robben who somehow contrived to shoot-over at the back-post. Di Maria, known for his defensive tendancies, was poor in tracking Alaba’s forward running and once Madrid dropped off the pedal, he couldn’t influence the game in an attacking sense, he was a by-stander and was eventually withdrawn for Kaka in the 75th minute.
I arrived a little nervous, not having a clue where I was going, which coach I was taking, anything really, I just arrived with my suitcase and freshly ironed uniform.
You can’t see
Plus you’re going to have to be on a mission every time you train. A good personal trainer wouldn’t go astray either.
I now realize I have bought a space ship by comparison to the little Nokia I have been using all these years!
I think the Coalition is going to need an enormous amount of creativity and cooperation from the civil service once it really gets going on the deficit. Sadly, the Mandarins aren’t renowned for either of those qualities….and turkeys don’t vote for Christmas.
in the back of my mind i knew the friendship would not last long, it was just a matter of time. i thought we would just drift apart, as most dying friendships do, an unexciting ending.
Bag-Sam Moon
“What bad things did you do?”
Each year after BlogHer (or any conference, really) I intend to share a little blog love with the sponsors, but I rarely get around to it. By the time I return home I'm some combination of exhausted and overwhelmed from 3 overstimulating days of conference fun.
Varietal: Voga
(Taken from part of a private email)
So, the day has started out okay. Have decided to start writing out lists of things i hope to accomplish the next day on my mirror in the bathroom the night before. My list for today was as follows:
It's been a bugger of a week and I'm fuckin' tired. In addition to all the usual, everyday drama of life, love, work and the general nitty gritty of my incredibly spicy lifestyle the computer caught a virus on Friday night while I was at work and I although I managed to recover all the files, nudey pictures and secret surveillance dossiers I keep on the neighbours, I am still in the process of reinstalling everything and getting it working right again. I won't point fingers or assign blame here other than to say that Mrs. Waring is now well aware that we did not need that update to Windows Media Player that she was offered by that very official looking pop up.
Description of the course: The first week of the course will be an intensive academic immersion, with structured morning, afternoon and evening classes. During the field study portion of the class in the second week, we will continue to have some formal class sessions each day, but there will also be educational or cultural field activities each day and the class schedules will be more fluid and revolve around these activities. Each day, two student guest bloggers will prepare a journal of the days’ events, which will be distributed to the entire class and also e-mailed home to your families through Duke TIP or posted to a secure website. At the end of the course, all the journal entries will be compiled into an electronic journal chronicling the course.
This time baby I’ll be Bulletproof
But when I saw The Beast from 20,000 Fathoms and
Circo has all the drama and gorgeous footage for a brilliant documentary, but it suffers from a problem similar to that of Page One: Inside The New York Times. The storytelling of both films comes across as unfocused and scattered, but more so in Page One than in Circo. In the latter’s case, its underlying theme—when the old-fashioned way is at odds with the new—is resolute, but the seemingly unlimited supply of supporting cast distracts, instead of adding on to the central storyline, which is the tension between Tino, who is always doing what’s best for the circus, and his wife Yvonne, who is unhappy with the price her children have to pay for the business to survive. Even though the subplots concerning Tino’s siblings and relatives are all relevant to this diminishing culture, they take away the screen time from the main characters, who are more than adequate in carrying the film.
Guy vomit sous mon nez !
In my opinion, one of the biggest misconceptions about weight loss is that you must have a strong sense of self-restraint to succeed. I personally believe that you just need to be a little smarter than your mind and body to achieve your goal.
Empty as restaurants after hours,
Some grey mornings, mild midwinter
Just looking at her.
Times:
Los Angeles CA 90071
Three blocks away, I get the call in the cab....
But when the night comes
2. Spiritualized - Baby I'm Just a Fool
My quest for some tea from the Azores — the Atlantic islands due west of Portugal, and governed by that once pioneering tea country — was finally rewarded a few months ago. After striking out in my attempts to contact the actual tea producers on the islands, Lucia, a t2 reader at a university in Rome, shared with me a couple of samples of the teas she had purchased locally (thanks again!). I'm just now getting around to trying them.
Oh, and don't be scared away by the title, it is referring to "sex" as in "gender" :)
In the Islands, it was believed that on the eve of Là Fhéill Bhrìghde (Feast of Bride), the Old Woman of Winter, the Cailleach, journeys to the magical isle in whose woods lie the miraculous Well of Youth. At the first glimmer of dawn, she drinks the water that bubbles in a crevice of a rock, and is transformed into Bride, the fair maid whose white wand turns the bare earth green again.
We missed Masazushi the last time because we simply couldn't find it. It was our first trip to Japan, and we didn't realise that we needed to be able to recognise the Japanese characters of restaurants because more often than not, their English transliterations are not on their signage. Our friend M led us to Masazushi this time, and they’ve definitely redone their exterior because it now clearly says “Masazushi Otaru”.
Ok, shhhhh, here's a secret: It will be another one in the list as well but buy some ink along with the fountain pen. If it's a cartridge pen, try to find a converter for it instead of cartridges. (Just ask, they will know) Wrap it up, put a bow on it and wait for the return gifts. Wait, I am being told that is not what the Holidays are about. Moving on.
Until next time...Happy Crafting!
countries and we have facilitated for their families and friends all
without any reason, the tears just flowed
She pretty much stays out of our room at night, that is, until last night. Sometime around 3 am, she decided she was ready to play. She kept jumping in the bed and crawling around on our heads. That's not very helpful when trying to sleep. We keep shooing her off the bed, but she kept returning. Finally, we ended up just closing the door, after making sure she had plenty of food and water, and making sure Jameson was OK.
Elbridge Goss printed a transcription of this letter in his two-volume biography of Revere in 1891, saying it was in the hands of a Revere grandson and already torn at one spot. But then the document dropped from sight. Recently it came to the Paul Revere House with other documents, and that museum sent it out to be conserved.
I’m still having some challenges with my back, but we’re working on that, so excuse me for not being too “present” in the world of blogging these days. I will be posting at dVersePoets’ Meeting the Bar tomorrow and hope to see you there. It is a great place to share poetry and friendship. I may need to vary the days that I do my weekly “Write2Day” entry so expect a bit of the unexpected. Thanks for being a part of the creative SPIRIT that happens here in the world of blogs.
10 Bruno Spoerri - Glückskugel - The Race
The scenario above is not intended as a prediction of what is likely to transpire with respect to Islam in Denmark or any other country. Rather, it is intended as a narrative, stitched together out of a large number of events (such with much precedent, some less) to try and stimulate an examination of the long-term implications of the Islamization of European countries, and certain issues that may have to be dealt with in fighting it. It is reasonably plausible in certain respects, and less so in others, but it is hoped that it will at least act as a springboard for further discussion.
6) A corer or back of spoon to 'blind' the pineapples (I dig out those 'eyes' instead of cutting)
Today's afternoon beer was the Finest Kind IPA from Smuttynose, and came on draft at TJ's. This draft pours with an apricot color and a thick head which stuck around, sort of a giant spoonful of marshmallow fluff in the glass. The aroma was light, with notes of citrus and grass. The taste is really good - a mix of grapefruit and hop bitterness, with some malt and a subtle earthy, grassy finish. Very good option if you're in the mood for an IPA.
I went in search of a copy of of the book for Grandma and found Poems Teachers Ask For Book II. I’m not sure if Grandma will recognize the poetry in it or not. Based on my favorite poems in the book, I will like your poetry better if your name is Henry. The number of poems written in dialect (Irish accent, southern drawl, etc) in the book surprised me. I almost immediately skip over these, which is probably a loss for me.
Yesterday, however, The Loosh was quiet and nervous. That's normal behavior for him on the first day -- it's the second day through the last day of school that everything really goes to hell.
One of the suspects, charged with attempted rape, was re-arrested by police at noon on Saturday in the Ntonga Administration area.
(Even two months in, it still feels weird to call myself mom...)
If we can only band together, form an unbroken bond of love, help each other, we will get through the rough times and be better prepared for the joy of life to come. I don’t understand why people step on each other to get ahead. Why do people do things that are knowingly wrong?
God is bigger than the air I breathe; the world will leave.
The next hour or so is fuzzy or nonexistent for me. All I remember is Steph lending me her flip flops because I was all of a sudden too fucked up to be without shoes. She had to walk me to the bathroom and someone, I think it was Yangchen, mentioned something about how we’d all take a taxi back.
After checking out and floating on a big fluffy cloud of elation and a goofy "Hail the conquering hero" playing in my head I went about my day. A week went by and I did a Skittles mani thinking about the amazing "Putting on the Ritz" from Dollish Polish that I had on it's way! *insert screeching noise* (wait for it... waaaaiiiittt for it...)
I felt at home – it was Sunday and just like being at the farmers market! Of curse there were lots of other exciting things going on, like music, mime, theatre and handicrafts, but it’s food what makes me happy!
The name of the course would be Designing Y(our) Future: Career, Creativity, and Change. (you could perhaps insert words like intrapreneur, entrepreneur, or innovation instead, but I think this initially works to get the idea across. I think Career, Creativity, and Change is sufficient for the course catalog.) I think you could add the word culture too….especially the way technology and innovation are influencing how we think….and what success looks like in the 21st century. (The class could be something like “21st Century Success Principles from Culture, Communication, and Science)
This week and next we are posting photos of our Victorian Holiday decorations. We have the house looking pretty snazzy (I believe that’s a Victorian decorating term).
He got some cash, but he didn't make it far.
Although low down in a dark area of the car and hidden behind bargeboards, the front splitter has been a critical part of the F1 car for many years. Known by many other terms, such as the shadow or legality plate, T-tray or bib, I’ll refer to this part as the splitter.
A bonafide popstar in his home country of The Netherlands, Bo Saris releases his first UK single ‘She’s On Fire’ on the 21st May, remixed by one of the biggest names in House music right now, Maya Jane Coles.
Strength: The three-point shot is the great equalizer in college basketball and the Raams are equal to the task of making them. They lead the Mountain West in three-point shooting percentage at 40.5 percent. This means they’re always a threat because they make up points in a hurry. They can shoot themselves back into any game and surprise a team if they get hot.
Deirdra: Where can our readers go to find your books and order them?
Little baby, I feel fresh,
Throws all her household chores away
Five free apps for secure password management – Trying to keep track of all your passwords can be tedious and frustrating and sometimes impossible. Here are a few password managers that can help.
"The Woman of the House" opens with a crippled man bargaining with two men over the price of painting his house. (I have seen a good bit of bargaining in the Irish short stories I have read this week.) Martina lives with the man. There relationship is a bit unclear. Martina once had hopes for a good happy life now she just strives to get by. She lets the butcher fumble her body in meat locker and does not have to pay for her chicken and pork. She takes the money this saves her from the funds the man gives her and hides it. As the story plays out we learn more of the history of the two painters, displaced persons from Poland now often called Gypsies. We come to try to understand the woman. The story is perfectly written and for sure kept me interested and wanting more. Like many an Irish short story, it deals with people on the fringes of society, outsiders, misfits and outcasts. I saw in this story and elsewhere this week that one can be an exile without moving away.
Starting week 6, which means by this weekend I’ll be halfway through. I’ll also get to enjoy an entire cheat day on Sunday. I’ll take my 6 week progress pics Sunday morning and do body fat measurements sometime next week to see how close I am to my previous best (last August).
"Uh, what?" The girl next to her whispered.
According to the article, Harrington/Sharp “worked” from a “sleazy sex dungeon near the city’s Haymarket train station.
While tracking Chandler on con into the coming darkness, Jonah notes that his prey is a 'wily cuss, doubling back on me' when suddenly a bullet hits the ground in front of his horse. Jonah jumps off the horse and fires up into the hills after the Chandler. Sometime later, Jonah finally comes upon Chandler laying next to a waterhole, laughing. It turns out that Jonah had accidentally pierced Chandler's canteen and in the darkness he didn't recognize one of the waterholes that he had poisoned earlier and has taken several drinks of the poisoned water.
The good news is that my blog received 101 views yesterday; it is the first time I have ever had 100 or more visits in a day. The bad news--well, most of those visits were from SPAM bots. In fact, at least 80-90 of the visitors were probably not human. Oh well, at least I had a moment to enjoy the number before the reality set in (that my visitors were not "real people").
No Limit survivor Fiend released something insane like 5 mixtapes this year of his new smoked out suave James Bond persona, and to be honest I don't know if I need 5 mixtapes of anything, much less that, but I'm still bumping that first one that dropped back in January.
3- 2008 Jim
Friday was one of my off days and I decided to make it as productive as possible! =)
For the first time since I was hired eight years ago, I am not teaching five days a week. I finagled having class-free Fridays, or what I'm referring to as Writing Fridays, in my schedule this semester.
Oil - 1 tbl spn
Captain Guy Disney, who lost his right leg below the knee in Afghanistan, has said that "RDA is a fantastic charity, it's holistic. Riding took my attention away from my injury. Hopefully those in the military will have greater contact with it and benefit from it".
Sipes IG, Gandolfi AJ. Biotransformation of toxicants. Amdur MO, Doull J, Klaassen CD (Eds.). Casarett and Doull’s toxicology: The basic science of poisons, 4th Ed. New York, McGraw-Hill, 1991: 13-16.
value for it?
Friends of ours host an annual Chocolate, Cheese, and Wine party every January. We thought it was a brilliant idea and completely stole it. Before the Christmas holiday we sent out invitations asking everyone to pick up some chocolates, cheese or wine on their travels. We slated the party for the first weekend after the break, and invited everyone to bring their goodies to share. It was a great time to catch up with friends, hear about their travel adventures, and to have fun sampling some special treats.
B.elle
9 a.m.– Welcome
There were two groups, one was the knot and the other was the observing group. The observer’s task was to watch and listen for strategies and social thinking skills that helped the group to be successful or that interfered with their success. The other group was the “Knot.”
Hi, friends!!
Of course I’m not going to leave you without some of the famous Unedited question and answers! So without further ado, I give you Michele!
“B.S.!” my friends are saying. Those who know me well are aware of my strange aversion to all tropical fruits, including coconut. Wait…is a coconut a fruit?
Hands waiting to caress you,
Bi-weekly, on palms (generous amount) and throughout scalp & hair. Used as a leave-in but can be washed out per directions.
Hopefully it's not a secret that I love my Homekeeping Binder and the documents that I have created to go into my binder. If you are thinking of making a binder, have created a binder or just curious as to whether or not a binder could help you in your home, today's post is for you.
Green and brown again, but a more "guy-inspired" look today.
First star I see tonight…
I cannot find any rational interpretation of that statement, other than “we wanted the process to stay within the gift of Jeremy Hunt, because we were assured of the result and its timing”. And they were about to get their wish, when the phone hacking scandal exploded.
When twenty-five-year-old Mary Stuart learns she inherited a farm from her recently murdered grandparents -- grandparents her father claimed had died before she was born -- she becomes obsessed with finding out who they were and why someone wanted them dead.
I haven’t seen a picture of me over the age of 9 months or under the age of 18 for 30 years. Anyway I called my dad last week and asked him to copy some pictures since I knew he had a ton, and he had all of grandma’s pictures too.
I had not one, but 5 (F-I-V-E) Visa gift cards in my purse. FIVE! I promise, I have not forgotten to use them. Each of them probably has a balance of $0.12 on it, and all pooled together, I couldn't get a $.50 cup of coffee. Nonetheless, I decided it would be worthwhile to check the balance on each of them, so I flipped them over to get the phone number or website and instructions for checking the balance. I ran into a problem. I can't read the text. Not with my glasses on. Not with them off. Not with my back-up reading glasses. I need an honest to goodness magnifying glass.
We shall see. In reality, I doubt we will, such is the weight of state approved homophobia in Uganda.
Hi Matt, thanks for agreeing to be our first interviewee.
So if you are Killer Yapp, you also want "Killer Yap" as a keyword cause a lot of people spell it that way. Same with "Ms Snark" (sound of cocking clue gun as optional audio would be good here too).
The new album was titled Persuasion and following the rejection of the album by MCA, Adam, together with a new band including Marco Pirroni, embarked on the live 1993 Persuasion Tour to attract a new label for the album. Ant was able to sign to new label Capitol Records in the USA and EMI in the UK, but MCA pulled a pissy pants move and was unwilling to let go of the Persuasion master tapes and so a new album Wonderful was recorded instead with the band from the tour. The album has surfaced as bootlegs and once in a while shows up in fan forums. This album is one of the 20 written about in "The Greatest Music Never Sold" by Dan Leroy, a book that reveals information on the legendary lost recordings of many famous artists. The latest news that I've found is that Sony now has the rights to the recordings, although nothing has been said yet with regards to releasing it. I picked this up from a fan site 7 or 8 years ago and as I was searching for the site again I found it's no longer in existence. I wouldn't call it his best work but there are moments of the Ant brilliance. So here is a couple cuts from the lost album and if anyone has been searching for it can drop me an email.
There are benefits in Volunteering and they’re better than the ones you are given. Volunteer for your own gratification, not for your money.
Other supplies: Kraft cardstock, Tim Holtz products: Tiny Attacher, Film Strip Ribbon, Pen Nibs & Lightbulbs.
Good Afternoon bloggers !
Shopping Small and Local that is...
Unfortunately, we’ve learned Shaq is not actually defending a traditional dissertation. Which is very disappointing for one reason: Dissertations are peer-reviewed and publicly available. And we already know from Shaq’s Miami Beach Police application — on which he listed “Laptop computer, binnochulars, master of surveillance” under special skills– that his writing style is incredible. We were really looking forward to dissecting Dr. O’Neal’s academic argument.
I would like to send you a FREE copy of the new 2012-2013 Catalog!
